Ohio, session 136, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3521.01 be amended and new 13
sections 3521.011, 3521.012, 3521.013, 3521.014, 3521.015, 14
3521.016, 3521.017, 3521.018, 3521.019, 3521.0110, 3521.0111, 15
3521.0112, 3521.0113, 3521.0114, and 3521.0115 of the Revised 16
Code be enacted to read as follows: 17
Sec. 3521.01. (A) As used in sections 3521.01 to 3521.0115 18
of the Revised Code, "census block" and "county" block," 19
"county," and "voting district" have the same meanings and 20
describe the same geographical boundaries as used by the United 21

S. B. No. 259 Page 2
As Introduced
States department of commerce, bureau of the census, in 22
reporting the 2020 decennial census of Ohio. The official report 23
of the 2020 decennial census of Ohio and all official documents 24
relating to that report of that census are hereby incorporated 25
by reference into sections 3521.01 to 3521.0115 of the Revised 26
Code. 27
(B) For the purpose of election of representatives to 28
congress, the state is divided into districts as described in 29
sections 3521.011 to 3521.0115 of the Revised Code. Any county 30
or part of a county of the state that has not been described as 31
included in one of those districts is included within the 32
district that contains the least population according to the 33
2020 decennial census referred to in this section and that is 34
contiguous to that county or part of that county. 35
Sec. 3521.011. The first congressional district contains 36
the following territory: 37
38
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Hamilton ADDYSTON A All
AMBERLEY A
AMBERLEY B
AMBERLEY C
AMBERLEY D
ANDERSON A
ANDERSON AA

S. B. No. 259 Page 3
As Introduced
ANDERSON B
ANDERSON BB
ANDERSON C
ANDERSON CC
ANDERSON D
ANDERSON DD
ANDERSON E
ANDERSON EE
ANDERSON F
ANDERSON FF
ANDERSON G
ANDERSON H
ANDERSON I
ANDERSON J
ANDERSON K
ANDERSON L
ANDERSON M
ANDERSON N
ANDERSON O
ANDERSON P
ANDERSON Q
ANDERSON R

S. B. No. 259 Page 4
As Introduced
ANDERSON S
ANDERSON T
ANDERSON U
ANDERSON V
ANDERSON W
ANDERSON X
ANDERSON Y
ANDERSON Z
ARLINGTON HGTS A
BLUE ASH 1-A
BLUE ASH 1-B
BLUE ASH 2-A
BLUE ASH 2-B
BLUE ASH 2-C
BLUE ASH 3-A
BLUE ASH 3-B
BLUE ASH 4-A
BLUE ASH 4-B
BLUE ASH 5-A
BLUE ASH 5-B
CHEVIOT 1-A
CHEVIOT 2-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 5
As Introduced
CHEVIOT 3-A
CHEVIOT 4-A
CINCINNATI 10-A
CINCINNATI 10-B
CINCINNATI 10-C
CINCINNATI 11-A
CINCINNATI 11-B
CINCINNATI 11-C
CINCINNATI 11-D
CINCINNATI 12-A
CINCINNATI 12-B
CINCINNATI 12-C
CINCINNATI 12-D
CINCINNATI 12-E
CINCINNATI 13-A
CINCINNATI 13-B
CINCINNATI 13-C
CINCINNATI 13-D
CINCINNATI 13-E
CINCINNATI 13-F
CINCINNATI 13-G
CINCINNATI 13-H

S. B. No. 259 Page 6
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 14-A
CINCINNATI 14-B
CINCINNATI 14-C
CINCINNATI 14-D
CINCINNATI 14-E
CINCINNATI 14-F
CINCINNATI 14-G
CINCINNATI 14-H
CINCINNATI 14-I
CINCINNATI 15-A
CINCINNATI 15-B
CINCINNATI 15-C
CINCINNATI 15-D
CINCINNATI 15-E
CINCINNATI 15-F
CINCINNATI 15-G
CINCINNATI 15-H
CINCINNATI 15-I
CINCINNATI 15-J
CINCINNATI 16-A
CINCINNATI 17-A
CINCINNATI 17-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 7
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 17-C
CINCINNATI 18-A
CINCINNATI 18-B
CINCINNATI 19-A
CINCINNATI 19-B
CINCINNATI 19-C
CINCINNATI 19-D
CINCINNATI 1-A
CINCINNATI 1-B
CINCINNATI 1-C
CINCINNATI 1-D
CINCINNATI 1-E
CINCINNATI 1-F
CINCINNATI 1-G
CINCINNATI 1-H
CINCINNATI 1-I
CINCINNATI 1-J
CINCINNATI 1-K
CINCINNATI 1-L
CINCINNATI 1-M
CINCINNATI 20-A
CINCINNATI 20-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 8
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 20-C
CINCINNATI 20-D
CINCINNATI 20-E
CINCINNATI 21-A
CINCINNATI 21-B
CINCINNATI 21-C
CINCINNATI 21-D
CINCINNATI 21-E
CINCINNATI 22-A
CINCINNATI 22-B
CINCINNATI 22-C
CINCINNATI 23-A
CINCINNATI 23-B
CINCINNATI 23-C
CINCINNATI 23-D
CINCINNATI 23-E
CINCINNATI 23-F
CINCINNATI 23-G
CINCINNATI 23-H
CINCINNATI 23-I
CINCINNATI 23-J
CINCINNATI 23-K

S. B. No. 259 Page 9
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 23-L
CINCINNATI 23-M
CINCINNATI 23-N
CINCINNATI 23-O
CINCINNATI 23-P
CINCINNATI 23-Q
CINCINNATI 23-R
CINCINNATI 24-A
CINCINNATI 24-B
CINCINNATI 24-C
CINCINNATI 24-D
CINCINNATI 24-E
CINCINNATI 24-F
CINCINNATI 24-G
CINCINNATI 24-H
CINCINNATI 24-I
CINCINNATI 25-A
CINCINNATI 25-B
CINCINNATI 25-C
CINCINNATI 25-D
CINCINNATI 25-E
CINCINNATI 25-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 10
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 25-G
CINCINNATI 25-H
CINCINNATI 25-I
CINCINNATI 25-J
CINCINNATI 25-K
CINCINNATI 25-L
CINCINNATI 26-A
CINCINNATI 26-B
CINCINNATI 26-C
CINCINNATI 26-D
CINCINNATI 26-E
CINCINNATI 26-F
CINCINNATI 26-G
CINCINNATI 26-H
CINCINNATI 26-I
CINCINNATI 26-J
CINCINNATI 26-K
CINCINNATI 26-L
CINCINNATI 26-M
CINCINNATI 26-N
CINCINNATI 26-O
CINCINNATI 26-P

S. B. No. 259 Page 11
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 26-Q
CINCINNATI 26-R
CINCINNATI 26-S
CINCINNATI 2-A
CINCINNATI 2-B
CINCINNATI 2-C
CINCINNATI 2-D
CINCINNATI 2-E
CINCINNATI 2-F
CINCINNATI 2-G
CINCINNATI 2-H
CINCINNATI 2-I
CINCINNATI 2-J
CINCINNATI 2-K
CINCINNATI 3-A
CINCINNATI 3-B
CINCINNATI 3-C
CINCINNATI 3-D
CINCINNATI 3-E
CINCINNATI 4-A
CINCINNATI 4-B
CINCINNATI 4-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 12
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 4-D
CINCINNATI 4-E
CINCINNATI 4-F
CINCINNATI 4-G
CINCINNATI 4-H
CINCINNATI 5-A
CINCINNATI 5-B
CINCINNATI 5-C
CINCINNATI 5-D
CINCINNATI 5-E
CINCINNATI 5-F
CINCINNATI 5-G
CINCINNATI 5-H
CINCINNATI 5-I
CINCINNATI 6-A
CINCINNATI 6-B
CINCINNATI 6-C
CINCINNATI 6-D
CINCINNATI 6-E
CINCINNATI 7-A
CINCINNATI 7-B
CINCINNATI 7-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 13
As Introduced
CINCINNATI 7-D
CINCINNATI 7-E
CINCINNATI 7-F
CINCINNATI 7-G
CINCINNATI 7-H
CINCINNATI 7-I
CINCINNATI 7-J
CINCINNATI 7-K
CINCINNATI 8-A
CINCINNATI 8-B
CINCINNATI 8-C
CINCINNATI 8-D
CINCINNATI 9-A
CINCINNATI 9-B
CINCINNATI 9-C
CINCINNATI 9-D
CLEVES A
CLEVES B
COLERAIN A
COLERAIN AA
COLERAIN B
COLERAIN BB

S. B. No. 259 Page 14
As Introduced
COLERAIN C
COLERAIN CC
COLERAIN D
COLERAIN DD
COLERAIN E
COLERAIN EE
COLERAIN F
COLERAIN FF
COLERAIN G
COLERAIN GG
COLERAIN H
COLERAIN HH
COLERAIN I
COLERAIN II
COLERAIN J
COLERAIN JJ
COLERAIN K
COLERAIN KK
COLERAIN L
COLERAIN LL
COLERAIN M
COLERAIN N

S. B. No. 259 Page 15
As Introduced
COLERAIN O
COLERAIN P
COLERAIN Q
COLERAIN R
COLERAIN S
COLERAIN T
COLERAIN U
COLERAIN V
COLERAIN W
COLERAIN X
COLERAIN Y
COLERAIN Z
COLUMBIA B
COLUMBIA C
COLUMBIA D
COLUMBIA E
COLUMBIA F
COLUMBIA G
C Hamilton COLUMBIA L 390610244013007
D Hamilton CROSBY A All
CROSBY B

S. B. No. 259 Page 16
As Introduced
DEER PARK 1-A
DEER PARK 2-A
DEER PARK 3-A
DEER PARK 4-A
DELHI A
DELHI B
DELHI C
DELHI D
DELHI E
DELHI F
DELHI G
DELHI H
DELHI I
DELHI J
DELHI K
DELHI L
DELHI M
DELHI N
DELHI O
DELHI P
DELHI Q
DELHI R

S. B. No. 259 Page 17
As Introduced
DELHI S
ELMWOOD A
EVENDALE A
EVENDALE B
EVENDALE C
FAIRFAX A
FOREST PARK A
FOREST PARK B
FOREST PARK C
FOREST PARK D
FOREST PARK E
FOREST PARK F
FOREST PARK G
FOREST PARK H
FOREST PARK I
FOREST PARK J
FOREST PARK K
FOREST PARK L
FOREST PARK M
GLENDALE A
GLENDALE B
GOLF MANOR A

S. B. No. 259 Page 18
As Introduced
GOLF MANOR B
GREEN A
GREEN AA
GREEN B
GREEN BB
GREEN C
GREEN CC
GREEN D
GREEN DD
GREEN E
GREEN EE
GREEN F
GREEN FF
GREEN G
GREEN GG
GREEN H
GREEN HH
GREEN I
GREEN II
GREEN J
GREEN JJ
GREEN K

S. B. No. 259 Page 19
As Introduced
GREEN KK
GREEN L
GREEN LL
GREEN M
GREEN MM
GREEN N
GREEN NN
GREEN O
GREEN OO
GREEN P
GREEN PP
GREEN Q
GREEN QQ
GREEN R
GREEN S
GREEN T
GREEN U
GREEN V
GREEN W
GREEN X
GREEN Y
GREEN Z

S. B. No. 259 Page 20
As Introduced
GREENHILLS A
GREENHILLS B
GREENHILLS C
HARR TWP AA
HARR TWP BB
HARR TWP CC
HARRISON A
HARRISON B
HARRISON C
HARRISON D
HARRISON E
HARRISON F
LINCOLN HGTS A
LINCOLN HGTS B
LOCKLAND A
LOCKLAND B
MARIEMONT A
MARIEMONT B
MIAMI TWP A
MIAMI TWP B
MIAMI TWP C
MIAMI TWP D

S. B. No. 259 Page 21
As Introduced
MIAMI TWP E
MIAMI TWP F
MIAMI TWP G
MIAMI TWP H
MONTGOMERY A
MONTGOMERY B
MONTGOMERY C
MONTGOMERY D
MONTGOMERY E
MONTGOMERY F
MONTGOMERY G
MONTGOMERY H
MONTGOMERY I
MT HEALTHY 1-A
MT HEALTHY 2-A
MT HEALTHY 3-A
MT HEALTHY 4-A
NEWTOWN A
NEWTOWN B
NO COLL HILL 1-A
NO COLL HILL 1-B
NO COLL HILL 2-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 22
As Introduced
NO COLL HILL 3-A
NO COLL HILL 4-A
NO COLL HILL 4-B
NO COLL HILL 4-C
NORTH BEND A
NORWOOD 1-A
NORWOOD 1-B
NORWOOD 1-C
NORWOOD 2-A
NORWOOD 2-B
NORWOOD 2-C
NORWOOD 3-A
NORWOOD 3-B
NORWOOD 3-C
NORWOOD 4-A
NORWOOD 4-B
NORWOOD 4-C
READING 1-A
READING 1-B
READING 2-A
READING 2-B
READING 3-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 23
As Introduced
READING 3-B
READING 4-A
READING 4-B
SHARONVILLE 1-A
SHARONVILLE 1-B
SHARONVILLE 2-A
SHARONVILLE 3-A
SHARONVILLE 3-B
SHARONVILLE 4-A
SHARONVILLE 4-B
E Hamilton SILVERTON A 390610238003000
390610238003001
390610238003002
390610238003003
390610238003004
390610238003005
390610238003006
390610238005002
390610238005004
390610238005005
390610238005007

S. B. No. 259 Page 24
As Introduced
F Hamilton SILVERTON C 390610238001000
390610238001001
390610238001002
390610238001003
390610238003007
390610238003008
390610238005000
390610238005001
390610240014001
390610240014003
390610240014004
390610240014005
G Hamilton SPRINGDALE A All
SPRINGDALE B
SPRINGDALE C
SPRINGDALE D
SPRINGDALE E
SPRINGDALE F
SPRINGDALE G
SPRINGDALE H
SPRINGFIELD A
SPRINGFIELD AA

S. B. No. 259 Page 25
As Introduced
SPRINGFIELD B
SPRINGFIELD BB
SPRINGFIELD C
SPRINGFIELD D
SPRINGFIELD E
SPRINGFIELD F
SPRINGFIELD G
SPRINGFIELD H
SPRINGFIELD I
SPRINGFIELD J
SPRINGFIELD K
SPRINGFIELD L
SPRINGFIELD M
SPRINGFIELD N
SPRINGFIELD O
SPRINGFIELD P
SPRINGFIELD Q
SPRINGFIELD R
SPRINGFIELD S
SPRINGFIELD T
SPRINGFIELD U
SPRINGFIELD V

S. B. No. 259 Page 26
As Introduced
SPRINGFIELD W
SPRINGFIELD X
SPRINGFIELD Y
SPRINGFIELD Z
ST BERNARD 1-A
ST BERNARD 2-A
ST BERNARD 3-A
ST BERNARD 4-A
SYCAMORE A
SYCAMORE B
SYCAMORE C
SYCAMORE D
SYCAMORE E
SYCAMORE F
SYCAMORE G
SYCAMORE H
SYCAMORE I
SYCAMORE J
SYCAMORE K
SYCAMORE L
SYCAMORE M
SYCAMORE N

S. B. No. 259 Page 27
As Introduced
TERRACE PARK A
TERRACE PARK B
WHITEWATER A
WHITEWATER B
WHITEWATER C
WOODLAWN A
WOODLAWN B
WYOMING A
WYOMING B
WYOMING C
WYOMING D
WYOMING E
Sec. 3521.012. The second congressional district contains 39
the following territory: 40
41
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Adams All All
C Brown All All
D Clark CHAS 1 All
CHAS TWP
CITY 11

S. B. No. 259 Page 28
As Introduced
CITY 15
CITY 16
CITY 17
E Clark CITY 25 390230007002004
390230007002005
390230007002006
390230007002007
390230019001022
390230034001071
F Clark CITY 26 All
CITY 27
CITY 31
CITY 32
CITY 33
CITY 34
CITY 35
CITY 36
CITY 37
GERM 1
GERM 2
GERM 3

S. B. No. 259 Page 29
As Introduced
GERM 4
GERM 5
HARM 1
HARM 2
MFLD 1
MFLD 10
MFLD 2
MFLD 3
MFLD 4
MFLD 5
MFLD 6
MFLD 7
MFLD 8
MFLD 9
PIKE 1
PIKE 2
PLES 1
PLES 2
T-1
T-2
G Clermont All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 30
As Introduced
H Clinton All All
I Fayette All All
J Hamilton COLUMBIA A All
COLUMBIA H
COLUMBIA I
COLUMBIA J
COLUMBIA K
K Hamilton COLUMBIA L 390610244012014
390610244012015
390610244013010
L Hamilton INDIAN HILL A All
INDIAN HILL B
INDIAN HILL C
INDIAN HILL D
INDIAN HILL E
INDIAN HILL F
LOVELAND A
LOVELAND B
LOVELAND C
LOVELAND D
LOVELAND E

S. B. No. 259 Page 31
As Introduced
LOVELAND F
LOVELAND G
MADEIRA A
MADEIRA B
MADEIRA C
MADEIRA D
MADEIRA E
MADEIRA F
MADEIRA G
MADEIRA H
M Hamilton SILVERTON A 390610238004007
390610238004008
390610238004009
390610238005003
390610238005006
390610238005008
390610238005009
N Hamilton SILVERTON B All
O Hamilton SILVERTON C 390610238001004
390610238001005
390610238001006

S. B. No. 259 Page 32
As Introduced
390610238002007
390610238002009
390610238002021
390610238004000
390610238004012
P Hamilton SYMMES A All
SYMMES B
SYMMES C
SYMMES D
SYMMES E
SYMMES F
SYMMES G
SYMMES H
SYMMES I
SYMMES J
SYMMES K
SYMMES L
Q Highland All All
R Jackson PRECINCT HAMILTON All
PRECINCT JACKSON
S Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 2-A 390799575001003

S. B. No. 259 Page 33
As Introduced
390799575001004
390799575001007
390799575001008
390799575001009
390799575001010
390799575001011
390799575003000
390799575003001
390799575003004
390799575003005
390799575003006
390799575003007
390799575003008
390799575003009
390799576003025
390799576003026
T Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 3-A 390799575002000
390799575002003
U Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 4-A All
PRECINCT JEFFERSON I
PRECINCT JEFFERSON II

S. B. No. 259 Page 34
As Introduced
PRECINCT LIBERTY I
PRECINCT LIBERTY II
V Jackson PRECINCT LICK I 390799575003002
390799576003006
W Jackson PRECINCT MADISON I All
PRECINCT MADISON II
PRECINCT OAK HILL I
PRECINCT OAK HILL II
PRECINCT SCIOTO I
PRECINCT SCIOTO II
X Madison All All
Y Pickaway All All
Z Pike All All
AA Ross All All
AB Scioto All All
Sec. 3521.013. The third congressional district contains 42
the following territory: 43
44
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Franklin BEXLEY 1-A All

S. B. No. 259 Page 35
As Introduced
BEXLEY 1-B
BEXLEY 2-A
BEXLEY 2-B
BEXLEY 3-A
BEXLEY 3-B
BEXLEY 3-C
BEXLEY 4-A
BEXLEY 4-B
BEXLEY 4-C
C Franklin BLENDON-C 390490071121010
390490071121013
390490071121014
390490071123003
390490071123010
390490071123012
390490071123015
390490071123016
390490071123017
390490071123018
390490071123019
390490071123030
390490071123031

S. B. No. 259 Page 36
As Introduced
390490071131012
390490071131015
390490071131018
390490071131019
390490071131021
390490071131023
390490071131024
390490071132003
390490071132005
390490071132017
390490071132018
390490071144011
390490071144024
390490071154002
390490071155000
390490071155002
390490071203029
390490071203031
390490071203033
390490071203034
390490071203036
390490071203038

S. B. No. 259 Page 37
As Introduced
390490071992000
390490071992001
390490071992002
390490071992010
390490071992015
390490071992021
390490071992031
390490071992034
390490072021015
390490072022011
390490072022012
390490072022016
D Franklin CANAL WIN-A All
CANAL WIN-B
CANAL WIN-C
CANAL WIN-D
CANAL WIN-E
CANAL WIN-F
CLINTON-A
CLINTON-B
COLS 01-A
COLS 01-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 38
As Introduced
COLS 01-C
E Franklin COLS 02-A 390490056101006
390490056101007
390490056101010
390490056101011
390490056101016
390490056101017
390490056101018
390490056101019
390490056101020
390490056101022
390490056101033
390490056101034
390490056101035
390490056101036
390490056201002
390490056201003
390490056201004
390490056201005
390490056201008
390490056201009
390490056201010

S. B. No. 259 Page 39
As Introduced
390490056201011
390490056202003
390490056202004
390490056202005
390490056203003
390490056203004
390490056203005
390490056203006
390490056203012
390490056203013
390490056204000
390490056204002
390490056204003
390490056204004
390490056204007
390490056204008
390490056204009
390490056204010
390490056204011
390490056204012
390490056204013
390490056204014

S. B. No. 259 Page 40
As Introduced
390490056204015
F Franklin COLS 02-B 390490058101017
390490058101018
390490058101019
390490058101024
390490058101025
390490058101026
390490058102000
390490058102001
390490058102002
390490058102003
390490058102004
390490058102005
390490058102006
390490058102007
390490058102008
390490058103000
390490058103001
390490058103004
390490058103005
390490058103006
390490058103029

S. B. No. 259 Page 41
As Introduced
G Franklin COLS 03-A All
COLS 03-B
COLS 03-C
COLS 03-D
COLS 04-A
COLS 04-B
COLS 04-C
COLS 04-D
COLS 05-A
COLS 05-B
COLS 05-C
COLS 05-D
COLS 06-A
COLS 06-B
COLS 06-C
COLS 06-D
COLS 06-E
COLS 06-F
COLS 07-A
COLS 07-B
COLS 07-C
COLS 07-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 42
As Introduced
COLS 07-E
COLS 08-A
COLS 08-B
H Franklin COLS 08-E 390490040012014
390490040012015
390490040012016
390490040012017
390490040012018
390490040012019
390490040012020
390490040012021
390490040012022
390490040012023
390490040012024
390490040012025
390490040012026
390490040012027
390490040012028
390490040012029
390490040012030
390490040012031
390490040012032

S. B. No. 259 Page 43
As Introduced
390490040021018
390490040021019
390490040021020
390490040021021
390490040021022
390490040021023
390490040021024
390490040022028
390490040022029
390490040022030
390490040022031
390490040022032
390490040022043
390490040022044
390490040022045
390490040022046
390490040022047
390490040022048
390490040022051
390490040022052
390490040022053
390490040022054

S. B. No. 259 Page 44
As Introduced
390490040022055
390490040022056
390490040022057
390490040022058
390490040022059
390490040022060
390490040022061
390490040022062
390490040022063
390490040022064
390490040022065
390490040022066
390490040022067
390490040022068
390490040022069
390490040022070
390490040022071
390490052002007
390490057004000
390490057004011
390490057004012
I Franklin COLS 08-F All

S. B. No. 259 Page 45
As Introduced
COLS 08-G
COLS 08-H
J Franklin COLS 09-A 390490049001001
K Franklin COLS 10-B 390490043012008
390490043012009
390490043012010
390490082411000
390490082411001
390490082411002
390490082411003
390490082411004
390490082411005
390490082411006
390490082411007
390490082411008
390490082411009
390490082411010
390490082411012
390490082411014
390490082411016
390490082411017

S. B. No. 259 Page 46
As Introduced
390490082411018
390490082411019
390490082411023
390490082411024
390490082411046
390490082411047
390490082411048
390490082411049
390490082411050
390490082412022
390490082412023
390490082412024
390490082412025
390490082412026
390490082412027
390490082412028
390490082412030
390490082412031
390490082412035
390490082412036
390490082412037
390490082412038

S. B. No. 259 Page 47
As Introduced
390490082412039
390490082412040
390490082412041
390490082412042
390490082412044
390490082412045
390490082424002
390490082424012
390490082424018
390490082424021
390490082424024
390490082424031
390490082424035
L Franklin COLS 10-C 390490045002000
390490045002001
390490047001000
390490047001001
390490047002000
390490047002001
390490049005001
390490049005002
390490049005003

S. B. No. 259 Page 48
As Introduced
390490049005004
390490049005005
390490049005006
390490049005010
390490049005015
390490049005016
390490049006000
390490049006001
390490049006002
390490049006003
390490082411025
M Franklin COLS 10-D All
COLS 10-E
COLS 11-A
COLS 11-B
COLS 11-C
COLS 11-D
COLS 11-E
COLS 12-A
COLS 12-B
COLS 12-C
COLS 12-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 49
As Introduced
COLS 12-E
COLS 13-A
COLS 13-B
COLS 13-C
COLS 13-D
COLS 16-C
N Franklin COLS 16-D 390490013011001
390490013011002
390490013011003
390490013021000
390490013021003
390490013021004
O Franklin COLS 16-F All
COLS 17-A
COLS 17-B
COLS 17-C
COLS 17-D
P Franklin COLS 22-D 390490077302000
390490077302001
390490077302002
390490077302003

S. B. No. 259 Page 50
As Introduced
390490077302004
390490077302005
390490077302007
390490077302008
390490077302009
390490077302010
390490077302011
390490077302012
390490077302013
390490077302014
390490077302015
390490077302016
390490077401005
390490077401006
390490077401007
390490077401008
390490077401009
390490077401010
390490077401013
390490077401015
390490077401016
390490077401017

S. B. No. 259 Page 51
As Introduced
390490077401018
Q Franklin COLS 22-E All
COLS 22-F
COLS 23-A
COLS 23-B
COLS 23-C
COLS 23-D
COLS 24-A
COLS 24-B
R Franklin COLS 24-C 390490003101012
390490003101013
390490003102023
390490003102024
390490003102025
390490003102026
390490003102027
390490003102028
390490003102031
390490003102032
390490003102033
390490003102034

S. B. No. 259 Page 52
As Introduced
390490003102038
390490003303002
390490003303003
390490003303004
390490003303008
390490007104001
390490007104002
390490007104003
390490007104009
390490007104010
390490007104014
S Franklin COLS 24-D All
COLS 24-E
COLS 25-A
COLS 25-B
COLS 25-C
COLS 25-D
COLS 25-E
COLS 25-F
COLS 25-G
COLS 25-H
COLS 26-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 53
As Introduced
COLS 26-B
COLS 26-C
COLS 27-A
COLS 27-B
COLS 27-C
COLS 27-D
COLS 27-E
COLS 27-F
COLS 28-A
COLS 28-B
COLS 28-C
COLS 28-D
COLS 28-E
COLS 28-F
COLS 29-A
COLS 29-B
COLS 29-C
COLS 29-D
COLS 30-A
COLS 30-B
T Franklin COLS 30-C 390490069211000
390490069211001

S. B. No. 259 Page 54
As Introduced
390490069211002
390490069211003
390490069212006
390490069212007
390490069212008
390490069212009
390490069214003
390490069214004
390490069214007
390490069214008
390490069214009
390490069214010
390490069214011
390490069214012
390490069214013
U Franklin COLS 30-D All
COLS 30-E
COLS 31-A
COLS 31-B
COLS 31-C
COLS 31-D
COLS 31-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 55
As Introduced
COLS 32-A
COLS 32-B
COLS 32-C
COLS 32-D
COLS 34-A
COLS 34-B
COLS 34-C
COLS 34-D
COLS 34-E
COLS 34-F
COLS 35-A
COLS 35-B
COLS 35-C
COLS 35-D
COLS 36-A
COLS 36-B
COLS 36-C
COLS 36-D
COLS 36-E
V Franklin COLS 37-B 390490051001000
390490051001001
390490051001003

S. B. No. 259 Page 56
As Introduced
390490051001004
390490051001006
390490051001007
390490051001008
390490051002005
390490051002006
390490051002007
390490051002008
390490051002010
390490051002013
390490051002023
390490051002024
390490051002025
390490051002031
390490051002032
390490051002033
390490051002034
390490051002035
390490051002036
390490051002037
390490051002038
390490051002039

S. B. No. 259 Page 57
As Introduced
390490051002042
390490051002044
390490051002045
390490051002046
390490051002047
390490051002048
390490051002049
W Franklin COLS 37-C All
COLS 37-D
COLS 37-E
COLS 38-A
COLS 38-B
X Franklin COLS 38-C 390490049001002
390490049001004
390490049001005
390490049001006
390490049001007
390490049001008
390490049001009
390490049001010
390490049001011

S. B. No. 259 Page 58
As Introduced
390490049001012
390490049001013
390490049001014
390490049001015
390490049001016
390490049001017
390490049001018
390490049001019
390490049001020
390490049002000
390490049002001
390490049002002
390490049002003
390490049002004
390490049002005
390490049002006
390490049002007
390490049002008
390490049002009
390490049002011
390490049002012
390490051002019

S. B. No. 259 Page 59
As Introduced
390490051002028
390490083301000
390490083301001
390490083301010
Y Franklin COLS 41-E All
COLS 42-A
COLS 42-B
COLS 42-C
COLS 42-D
COLS 42-E
Z Franklin COLS 43-A 390490003101004
390490003102000
390490003102001
390490003102002
390490003102003
390490003102004
390490003102005
390490003102006
390490003102007
390490003102010
390490003102011

S. B. No. 259 Page 60
As Introduced
390490003102012
390490003102013
390490003102014
390490003102022
390490003102037
AA Franklin COLS 43-B All
COLS 43-C
COLS 43-D
COLS 43-E
COLS 44-A
COLS 44-B
COLS 44-C
COLS 44-D
COLS 44-E
COLS 44-F
COLS 44-G
COLS 44-H
COLS 45-A
COLS 45-B
COLS 45-C
COLS 45-D
COLS 45-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 61
As Introduced
COLS 45-F
COLS 45-G
COLS 45-H
COLS 45-I
COLS 45-J
COLS 45-K
COLS 45-L
COLS 45-M
COLS 45-N
COLS 45-O
COLS 46-A
COLS 46-B
COLS 46-C
COLS 46-D
COLS 46-E
COLS 46-F
COLS 46-G
COLS 46-H
COLS 46-I
COLS 46-J
COLS 46-K
COLS 46-L

S. B. No. 259 Page 62
As Introduced
COLS 46-M
COLS 47-A
COLS 47-B
COLS 47-C
COLS 47-D
COLS 47-E
COLS 47-F
COLS 48-A
COLS 48-B
COLS 48-C
COLS 48-D
COLS 48-E
COLS 49-A
COLS 49-B
COLS 49-C
COLS 49-D
COLS 49-E
COLS 49-F
COLS 49-G
COLS 49-H
COLS 50-A
COLS 50-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 63
As Introduced
COLS 50-C
COLS 50-D
COLS 50-E
COLS 51-A
COLS 51-B
COLS 51-C
COLS 51-D
COLS 52-A
COLS 52-B
COLS 52-C
COLS 52-D
COLS 52-E
COLS 52-F
COLS 52-G
COLS 52-H
COLS 53-A
COLS 53-B
COLS 53-C
COLS 53-D
COLS 53-E
COLS 53-F
COLS 53-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 64
As Introduced
COLS 53-H
COLS 54-A
COLS 54-B
COLS 54-C
COLS 54-D
COLS 54-E
COLS 54-F
COLS 55-A
COLS 55-B
COLS 55-C
COLS 55-D
COLS 56-A
COLS 56-B
COLS 56-C
COLS 56-D
COLS 56-E
COLS 57-A
COLS 57-B
COLS 57-C
COLS 57-D
COLS 57-E
COLS 57-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 65
As Introduced
COLS 57-G
COLS 58-A
COLS 58-B
COLS 58-C
COLS 58-D
COLS 58-E
COLS 58-F
COLS 58-G
COLS 58-H
COLS 58-I
COLS 58-J
COLS 58-K
COLS 61-A
COLS 61-B
COLS 61-C
AB Franklin COLS 61-D 390490069442005
390490069444002
390490069444003
390490069444005
390490069444006
390490069444007
390490069444009

S. B. No. 259 Page 66
As Introduced
390490069444011
390490069444012
390490069444013
390490069444015
390490069444016
390490069444017
390490069444019
390490069451000
390490069451001
390490069451002
390490069451004
390490069451005
390490069921000
AC Franklin COLS 62-A All
AD Franklin COLS 62-B 390490071992005
390490071992009
390490071992011
390490071992016
390490071992017
390490071992018
390490071992019

S. B. No. 259 Page 67
As Introduced
390490071992022
390490071992023
390490071992024
390490071992025
390490071992026
390490071992027
390490071992028
390490071992029
390490071992030
390490071992032
390490071992033
390490071992035
390490071992036
390490071992037
390490071992038
390490071992039
390490071992040
390490071992041
AE Franklin COLS 62-D All
COLS 62-E
COLS 66-A
COLS 66-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 68
As Introduced
COLS 66-C
COLS 66-D
COLS 66-E
AF Franklin COLS 66-F 390490071141022
390490071142004
390490071142005
390490071142006
390490071142007
390490071142008
390490071143001
390490071143015
390490071143016
390490071143017
390490071143019
390490071143020
390490071143021
390490071144006
390490071144007
390490071144008
390490071144009
390490071144010
390490071144012

S. B. No. 259 Page 69
As Introduced
390490071144022
390490071144025
390490071144026
390490071144027
390490071203001
390490071203002
390490071203005
AG Franklin COLS 67-A All
COLS 67-B
COLS 67-C
COLS 67-D
COLS 67-E
COLS 67-F
COLS 67-G
COLS 67-H
COLS 67-I
COLS 68-A
COLS 68-B
COLS 68-C
COLS 68-D
AH Franklin COLS 77-A 390490082412013

S. B. No. 259 Page 70
As Introduced
390490082412014
390490082421016
390490082421017
390490082422026
390490082422032
390490082422037
390490082422038
390490082422042
AI Franklin COLS 78-D All
COLS 78-H
COLS 79-A
COLS 79-B
COLS 79-C
COLS 79-D
COLS 79-E
COLS 81-A
COLS 81-B
COLS 81-C
COLS 81-D
COLS 81-E
COLS 83-A
COLS 83-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 71
As Introduced
COLS 83-C
COLS 83-D
COLS 83-E
COLS 83-F
COLS 83-G
COLS 83-H
COLS 83-I
COLS 83-J
COLS 84-A
COLS 84-B
COLS 84-C
COLS 84-D
COLS 84-E
COLS 84-F
COLS 84-G
COLS 84-H
COLS 85-A
COLS 85-B
COLS 85-C
COLS 85-D
COLS 85-E
COLS 86-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 72
As Introduced
COLS 86-B
COLS 86-C
COLS 86-D
COLS 86-E
COLS 86-F
COLS 86-G
COLS 86-H
COLS 86-I
COLS 86-J
COLS 87-A
COLS 87-B
COLS 87-C
COLS 87-D
COLS 87-E
FRANKLIN-A
FRANKLIN-B
AJ Franklin FRANKLIN-C 390490082101006
390490082102045
390490082102046
390490082102047
390490082102055
390490082411011

S. B. No. 259 Page 73
As Introduced
390490082411013
390490082411015
390490082411020
390490082411021
390490082411022
390490082411029
390490082411030
390490082411032
390490082411045
390490082412001
390490082412010
390490082412011
390490082412012
390490082412017
390490082412018
390490082412019
390490082412020
390490082412021
390490082412029
390490082412032
390490082412033
390490082412034

S. B. No. 259 Page 74
As Introduced
390490082412043
390490082412046
390490082412047
390490082421003
390490082421004
390490082421018
390490082421019
390490082421020
390490082421021
390490082421025
390490082421026
390490082421027
390490082421032
390490082421038
390490082422000
390490082422001
390490082422003
390490082422007
390490082422012
390490082422013
390490082422023
390490082422027

S. B. No. 259 Page 75
As Introduced
390490082422033
390490082422039
390490082422040
390490082422041
390490082422044
390490082423000
390490082423003
390490082423008
390490082423009
390490082423010
390490082423021
390490082423032
390490082424000
390490082424001
390490082424003
390490082424004
390490082424006
390490082424007
390490082424008
390490082424009
390490082424010
390490082424011

S. B. No. 259 Page 76
As Introduced
390490082424017
390490082424019
390490082424020
390490082424022
390490082424023
390490082424030
390490082424032
390490082424033
390490082424034
390490082424037
390490082424039
AK Franklin FRANKLIN-D All
FRANKLIN-E
FRANKLIN-F
GAH 1-A
GAH 1-B
GAH 1-C
GAH 1-D
GAH 1-E
GAH 1-F
GAH 1-G
GAH 2-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 77
As Introduced
GAH 2-B
GAH 2-C
GAH 2-D
GAH 2-E
GAH 2-F
GAH 2-G
GAH 2-H
GAH 2-I
GAH 3-A
GAH 3-B
GAH 3-C
GAH 3-D
GAH 3-E
GAH 3-F
GAH 3-G
GAH 4-A
GAH 4-B
GAH 4-C
GAH 4-D
GAH 4-E
GAH 4-F
GAH 4-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 78
As Introduced
GROVE CITY 1-A
GROVE CITY 1-B
GROVE CITY 1-C
GROVE CITY 1-D
GROVE CITY 1-E
GROVE CITY 1-F
GROVE CITY 1-G
GROVE CITY 2-A
GROVE CITY 2-B
GROVE CITY 2-C
GROVE CITY 2-D
GROVE CITY 2-E
GROVE CITY 2-F
GROVE CITY 2-G
GROVE CITY 3-A
GROVE CITY 3-B
GROVE CITY 3-C
GROVE CITY 3-D
GROVE CITY 3-E
GROVE CITY 3-F
GROVE CITY 3-G
GROVE CITY 3-H

S. B. No. 259 Page 79
As Introduced
GROVE CITY 4-A
GROVE CITY 4-B
GROVE CITY 4-C
GROVE CITY 4-D
GROVE CITY 4-E
GROVE CITY 4-F
GROVE CITY 4-G
GROVEPORT-A
GROVEPORT-B
GROVEPORT-C
GROVEPORT-D
GROVEPORT-E
HAMILTON-A
HAMILTON-B
HAMILTON-C
JACKSON-A
JACKSON-B
JACKSON-C
JACKSON-D
JEFFERSON-A
JEFFERSON-B
JEFFERSON-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 80
As Introduced
JEFFERSON-D
JEFFERSON-E
JEFFERSON-F
JEFFERSON-G
JEFFERSON-H
JEFFERSON-I
JEFFERSON-J
MADISON-A
MADISON-B
MADISON-C
MADISON-D
MADISON-E
MADISON-F
MADISON-G
MADISON-H
MIFFLIN-A
MIFFLIN-B
MINERVA PARK-A
AL Franklin NORWICH-A 390490079412021
390490079412026
390490079412030

S. B. No. 259 Page 81
As Introduced
AM Franklin OBETZ-A All
OBETZ-B
OBETZ-C
PLEASANT-A
PLEASANT-B
PLEASANT-C
PLEASANT-D
PLEASANT-E
PLEASANT-F
PRAIRIE-A
PRAIRIE-B
AN Franklin PRAIRIE-C 390490081651001
390490081651002
390490081651003
390490081651004
390490081651007
390490081651009
390490081651010
390490081652008
AO Franklin PRAIRIE-D All
PRAIRIE-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 82
As Introduced
PRAIRIE-F
PRAIRIE-G
PRAIRIE-H
PRAIRIE-I
PRAIRIE-J
PRAIRIE-K
PRAIRIE-L
PRAIRIE-M
REYNS 1-A
REYNS 1-B
REYNS 1-C
REYNS 1-D
REYNS 1-E
REYNS 1-F
REYNS 1-G
REYNS 2-A
REYNS 2-B
REYNS 2-C
REYNS 2-D
REYNS 2-E
REYNS 2-F
REYNS 2-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 83
As Introduced
REYNS 3-A
REYNS 3-B
REYNS 4-A
REYNS 4-B
REYNS 4-C
REYNS 4-D
REYNS 4-E
REYNS 4-F
REYNS 4-G
AP Franklin SHARON-A 390490069312001
390490069444004
390490069444008
390490069444010
390490069444014
390490069444018
390490069444020
390490069444021
390490069444022
390490069444023
390490069451003
390490069451006
390490069451010

S. B. No. 259 Page 84
As Introduced
AQ Franklin TRURO-A All
TRURO-B
URBANCREST-A
VALLEYVIEW-A
WHITEHALL 1-A
WHITEHALL 1-B
WHITEHALL 2-A
WHITEHALL 2-B
WHITEHALL 2-C
WHITEHALL 3-A
WHITEHALL 3-B
WHITEHALL 3-C
WHITEHALL 4-A
WHITEHALL 4-B
WHITEHALL 4-C
Sec. 3521.014. The fourth congressional district contains 45
the following territory: 46
47
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Allen All All
C Auglaize All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 85
As Introduced
D Champaign All All
E Crawford Bucyrus 1A 390339744001027
390339744001038
390339744001043
390339744001045
390339744001046
390339744001047
390339744001049
390339744001050
390339744001051
390339744001052
390339744001053
390339744001054
390339744001059
390339744001060
390339745002014
390339745002015
390339745002016
390339745002031
390339745002032
390339745002033
390339745002034

S. B. No. 259 Page 86
As Introduced
390339746001009
390339746001010
390339746001011
390339746001012
390339746001029
390339746001030
390339746001031
F Crawford Bucyrus 1B 390339744001003
390339744001011
390339744001012
390339744001030
390339744001033
390339744002000
390339744002012
390339744002013
390339744002014
390339744002015
390339744002016
390339744002017
390339744002028
390339744002029
390339744002030

S. B. No. 259 Page 87
As Introduced
390339744002031
390339744002032
390339744002033
390339744002034
390339744002035
390339744002036
390339744002037
390339744002038
390339744002042
390339744002043
390339744002044
390339744002045
390339744002046
390339744003004
390339744003005
390339744003006
390339744003007
390339744003012
390339744003013
390339744003014
390339744003015
390339744003016

S. B. No. 259 Page 88
As Introduced
390339744003017
390339744003020
390339744003025
390339745001000
390339745001001
G Crawford Bucyrus 2A All
Bucyrus 2B
Bucyrus 3A
Bucyrus 3B
Bucyrus 3C
Bucyrus 4A
Bucyrus 4B
Bucyrus Twp
Dallas Twp
H Crawford Holmes-Texas 390339742003001
390339742003002
390339742003003
390339742003004
390339742003005
390339742003006
390339742003007

S. B. No. 259 Page 89
As Introduced
390339742003008
390339742003009
390339742003010
390339742003011
390339742003012
390339742003013
390339742003016
390339742003017
390339742003018
390339742003019
390339742003020
390339742003021
390339742003022
390339742003023
390339742003024
390339742003025
390339742003026
390339742003027
390339742003028
390339742003029
390339742003030
390339742003031

S. B. No. 259 Page 90
As Introduced
390339742003032
390339742003033
390339742003034
390339742003035
390339742003036
390339742003037
390339742003038
390339742003039
390339742003040
390339742003041
390339742003042
390339742003043
390339742003044
390339742003045
390339742003046
390339742003047
390339742003048
390339742003049
390339742003050
390339742003051
390339742003052
390339742003053

S. B. No. 259 Page 91
As Introduced
390339742003054
390339742003055
390339742003056
390339742003057
390339742003058
390339742003059
390339742003060
390339742003061
390339742003062
390339742003063
390339742003064
390339742003067
390339742003068
390339742003069
390339742003070
390339744001002
390339744001004
390339744001006
390339744001007
390339744001008
390339744001009
390339744001010

S. B. No. 259 Page 92
As Introduced
390339744001017
390339744001018
390339744001019
390339744001040
390339744001057
390339744002002
390339744002004
390339744002005
390339744002006
390339744002009
390339744002011
390339744002018
390339744003001
390339747001024
390339747001025
390339747001026
390339747001034
390339747001035
I Crawford Lykens-Tod 390339742002000
390339742002001
390339742002002
390339742002003

S. B. No. 259 Page 93
As Introduced
390339742002004
390339742002005
390339742002006
390339742002007
390339742002008
390339742002009
390339742002010
390339742002011
390339742002012
390339742002013
390339742002014
390339742002015
390339742002016
390339742002017
390339742002018
390339742002019
390339742002020
390339742002021
390339742002022
390339742002023
390339742002024
390339742002025

S. B. No. 259 Page 94
As Introduced
390339742002026
390339742002027
390339742002028
390339742002029
390339742002030
390339742002031
390339742002032
390339742002033
390339742002034
390339742002035
390339742002036
390339742002037
390339742002038
390339742002039
390339742002040
390339742002041
390339742002042
390339742002043
390339742002044
390339742002045
390339742002046
390339742002047

S. B. No. 259 Page 95
As Introduced
390339742002048
390339742002049
390339742002050
390339742002051
390339742002062
390339742002063
390339742002064
390339742002065
390339742002066
390339742002073
J Crawford Sandusky-Whetstone North 390339744001025
390339744001026
390339744001035
390339744001036
390339744001037
390339744001041
390339744001042
390339744001048
390339744001065
390339744001066
390339746001000
390339746001001

S. B. No. 259 Page 96
As Introduced
390339746001022
390339746003000
390339746003010
390339747001074
390339747001075
390339747001076
390339747001077
390339747001078
390339747001079
390339747001080
390339747001081
390339747001082
390339747001083
390339747001084
390339747001085
390339747001086
390339747002064
390339747002065
390339747002066
390339747002067
390339747002068
390339747002069

S. B. No. 259 Page 97
As Introduced
390339747002070
390339747002071
390339747003004
390339747003005
390339747003006
390339747003007
390339747003008
390339747003009
390339747003010
390339747003011
390339747003012
390339747003013
390339747003014
390339747003015
390339747003016
390339747003033
390339747003034
390339747003035
390339747003036
390339747003037
390339747003038
390339747003039

S. B. No. 259 Page 98
As Introduced
390339747003040
390339747003042
390339747003043
390339747004000
390339747004001
390339747004002
390339747004003
390339747004004
390339747004018
390339747004019
390339747004020
K Crawford Whetstone Twp South All
L Defiance All All
M Fulton All All
N Hancock All All
O Hardin All All
P Henry All All
Q Logan All All
R Marion All All
S Mercer All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 99
As Introduced
T Miami BETHEL EAST All
BETHEL SOUTH CENTRAL
BETHEL SOUTH EAST
BETHEL WEST
BRADFORD
BROWN / FLETCHE R
COVINGTON A / B
COVINGTON C / D
ELIZABETH
HUBER HEIGHTS A
HUBER HEIGHTS B
LOSTCREEK / CASSTOW N
U Miami MONROE EAST CENTRAL 391093550022002
V Miami NEWBERRY EAST All
NEWBERRY WEST
PIQUA 1-A
PIQUA 1-B / D
PIQUA 1-C / E
PIQUA 2-A
PIQUA 2-B / C
PIQUA 2-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 100
As Introduced
PIQUA 3-A
PIQUA 3-B / C
PIQUA 3-D / E
PIQUA 4-A
PIQUA 4-B / C
PIQUA 4-D / E
PIQUA 5-A
PIQUA 5-B
PIQUA 5-C
PIQUA 5-D
SPRINGCREEK EAST
SPRINGCREEK WEST
W Miami TIPP CITY D 391093550013002
391093550013003
391093550013013
391093550013014
391093550013015
X Miami TIPP CITY G 391093550012000
391093550013000
391093550013001
391093550013006

S. B. No. 259 Page 101
As Introduced
391093550013008
391093550013009
391093550013010
391093550021010
391093550021011
391093550021012
391093550021029
391093550022007
391093550022016
391093550022017
391093550022018
Y Miami TIPP CITY H All
WASHINGTON
Z Paulding All All
AA Putnam All All
AB Shelby All All
AC Van Wert All All
AD Williams All All
Sec. 3521.015. The fifth congressional district contains 48
the following territory: 49
50

S. B. No. 259 Page 102
As Introduced
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Ashland All All
C Coshocton All All
D Crawford Auburn Twp All
E Crawford Bucyrus 1A 390339744001039
390339744001044
390339744001064
390339744004000
390339744004001
390339744004002
390339744004003
390339744004004
390339744004005
390339744004006
390339744004007
390339744004008
390339744004009
390339744004010
390339744004011
390339744004012

S. B. No. 259 Page 103
As Introduced
390339744004013
390339744004014
390339744004015
390339745002000
390339745002010
390339745002013
390339746001004
390339746001005
F Crawford Bucyrus 1B 390339744003002
390339744003003
390339744003008
390339744003009
390339744003010
390339744003011
390339744003026
390339744003027
390339744003028
G Crawford Chatfield Twp All
Cranberry Twp
Crestline 1A
Crestline 2A

S. B. No. 259 Page 104
As Introduced
Crestline 3A
Crestline 4A
Galion 1A
Galion 1B
Galion 2A
Galion 2B
Galion 3A
Galion 3B
Galion 4A
Galion 4B
Galion 4C
H Crawford Holmes-Texas 390339742001006
390339742001007
390339742001008
390339742001009
390339742001010
390339742001011
390339742001012
390339742001013
390339742001026
390339742001027
390339742001028

S. B. No. 259 Page 105
As Introduced
390339742001029
390339742001030
390339742001031
390339742001032
390339742001033
390339742001034
390339742001035
390339742001036
390339742001037
390339742001038
390339742001039
390339742001040
390339742001041
390339742001042
390339742001043
390339742001044
390339742001045
390339742001074
390339742001089
390339742001090
390339742001091
390339742001093

S. B. No. 259 Page 106
As Introduced
390339742001094
390339742001095
390339742001096
390339742001097
390339742001098
390339742001099
390339742001101
390339742001102
390339742001103
I Crawford Jefferson Twp All
Liberty Twp
J Crawford Lykens-Tod 390339742001000
390339742001001
390339742001002
390339742001003
390339742001004
390339742001005
390339742001014
390339742001015
390339742001016
390339742001017

S. B. No. 259 Page 107
As Introduced
390339742001018
390339742001019
390339742001020
390339742001021
390339742001022
390339742001023
390339742001024
390339742001025
390339742001046
390339742001047
390339742001048
390339742001049
390339742001050
390339742001051
390339742001052
390339742001053
390339742001054
390339742001055
390339742001056
390339742001057
390339742001058
390339742001059

S. B. No. 259 Page 108
As Introduced
390339742001060
390339742001061
390339742001062
390339742001063
390339742001064
390339742001065
390339742001066
390339742001067
390339742001068
390339742001069
390339742001070
390339742001071
390339742001072
390339742001073
390339742001075
390339742001076
390339742001077
390339742001078
390339742001079
390339742001080
390339742001081
390339742001082

S. B. No. 259 Page 109
As Introduced
390339742001083
390339742001084
390339742001085
390339742001086
390339742001087
390339742001088
390339742001092
390339742001100
K Crawford Polk Twp All
L Crawford Sandusky-Whetstone North 390339741004024
390339741004027
390339741004028
390339741004046
390339741004068
390339741004069
390339741004070
390339741004071
390339741004072
390339741004073
390339741004074
390339741004082

S. B. No. 259 Page 110
As Introduced
390339747002002
390339747002003
390339747002004
390339747002005
390339747002006
390339747002007
390339747002018
390339747002019
390339747002025
390339747002026
390339747002027
390339747002028
390339747002031
390339747002032
390339747002034
390339747002035
390339747002040
390339747002041
390339747002042
390339747002043
390339747002044
390339747002045

S. B. No. 259 Page 111
As Introduced
390339747002051
390339747002052
390339747002053
390339747002054
390339747002055
390339747002059
M Crawford Vernon Twp All
N Holmes All All
O Huron All All
P Knox All All
Q Morrow All All
R Richland All All
S Sandusky All All
T Seneca All All
U Tuscarawas AUBURN TWP All
BALTIC VILLAGE
BUCKS TWP
V Tuscarawas GOSHEN TWP 4 391570215011055
391570215012043
391570215012044

S. B. No. 259 Page 112
As Introduced
391570215012045
391570215012062
391570215012064
391570215012072
W Tuscarawas JEFFERSON TWP & STONECREEK All
NEW PHILADELPHIA 4A
NEW PHILADELPHIA 4B
X Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4C 391570215011039
391570215011040
391570215011042
391570215011043
391570215011044
391570215012020
391570215012023
391570215012024
391570215012025
391570215012026
391570215012035
391570215012036
391570215012037
391570215012038

S. B. No. 259 Page 113
As Introduced
391570215012039
391570215012040
391570215012041
391570215012042
391570215012046
391570215012047
391570215012048
391570215012049
391570215012050
391570215012051
391570215012052
391570215012053
391570215012056
391570215012057
391570215012058
391570215012061
391570215012063
391570215012065
391570215012066
Y Tuscarawas SUGARCREEK TWP All
SUGARCREEK VILLAGE 1
SUGARCREEK VILLAGE 2

S. B. No. 259 Page 114
As Introduced
YORK TWP
Z Wayne All All
AA Wood BLOOM TWP NORTH All
BLOOM TWP SOUTH
BOWLING GREEN 1-A
BOWLING GREEN 1-B
BOWLING GREEN 1-C
BOWLING GREEN 2-A
BOWLING GREEN 2-B
BOWLING GREEN 2-C
BOWLING GREEN 2-D
BOWLING GREEN 2-F
BOWLING GREEN 3-B
BOWLING GREEN 3-C
BOWLING GREEN 3-D
BOWLING GREEN 3-E
BOWLING GREEN 3-G
BOWLING GREEN 4-A
BOWLING GREEN 4-B
BOWLING GREEN 4-D
BOWLING GREEN 4-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 115
As Introduced
BOWLING GREEN 4-H
BOWLING GREEN 4-J
CENTER TOWNSHIP
FOSTORIA CITY
FREEDOM TOWNSHIP
FREEDOM TWP PEMBERVILLE
GRAND RAPIDS TWP GR
GRAND RAPIDS TWP PARK
HENRY TWP HAMMANSBURG
HENRY TWP N BALTIMORE A
HENRY TWP N BALTIMORE B
JACKSON TWP
LIBERTY TWP
MIDDLETON TWP DUNBRIDGE
MIDDLETON TWP HASKINS
MIDDLETON TWP NORTH
MIDDLETON TWP SOUTH
MILTON TWP
MONTGOMERY TWP NE
MONTGOMERY TWP SE
MONTGOMERY TWP WEST
PERRY TWP EAST

S. B. No. 259 Page 116
As Introduced
PERRY TWP PERRY
AB Wood PERRYSBURG E 391730204021009
391730204021012
391730204021015
391730204021016
AC Wood PERRYSBURG G All
PERRYSBURG I
PERRYSBURG K
PERRYSBURG L
AD Wood PERRYSBURG O 391730204021019
391730204021020
391730204021021
AE Wood PERRYSBURG TWP FT MEIGS 391730206011024
391730206011027
391730206011028
391730206011029
391730206011030
391730206011031
391730206011032
391730206011033
391730206011034

S. B. No. 259 Page 117
As Introduced
391730206011037
391730206011038
391730206011039
391730206011042
391730206011043
391730206011044
391730206011045
391730206011046
391730206011048
391730206011052
391730206011053
391730206011055
391730206024011
391730206024028
391730206024029
391730206024030
391730212001006
AF Wood PERRYSBURG X 391730206011021
391730206011025
391730206011041
391730206011049
391730206024000

S. B. No. 259 Page 118
As Introduced
391730206024003
391730206024004
391730206024014
391730206024015
391730206024016
391730206024017
391730206024018
391730206024019
391730206024020
391730206024021
391730206024022
391730206024023
391730206024024
391730206024025
391730206024026
391730206024027
391730206024031
391730206024032
391730206024033
391730206024034
391730206024035
391730206024036

S. B. No. 259 Page 119
As Introduced
391730206024037
391730206024038
391730206024039
391730206024040
391730206024041
391730206024043
AG Wood PLAIN TWP All
PORTAGE TOWNSHIP EAST
PORTAGE TOWNSHIP WEST
TROY TWP LUCKEY
TROY TWP NORTH
TROY TWP SOUTH
WASHINGTON TWP
WASHINGTON TWP TONTOGANY
WEBSTER TWP
WESTON TWP WESTON VILL
WESTON TWP WILLOW
AH Wyandot All All
Sec. 3521.016. The sixth congressional district contains 51
the following territory: 52
53
1 2 3

S. B. No. 259 Page 120
As Introduced
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Belmont All All
C Carroll All All
D Columbiana All All
E Guernsey All All
F Harrison All All
G Jefferson All All
H Mahoning BEAVER 1 All
BEAVER 2
BEAVER 3
BEAVER 4
BEAVER 5
BEAVER 6
BEAVER 7
BELOIT 1
BERLIN 1
BERLIN 2
COITSVILLE 01
I Mahoning COITSVILLE 02 390998108001006
390998109001000

S. B. No. 259 Page 121
As Introduced
390998109001001
390998109001002
390998109001003
390998109001004
390998109001005
390998109001006
390998109001007
390998109001008
390998109001009
390998109001010
390998109001011
390998109001012
390998109001013
390998109001014
390998109001015
390998109001016
390998109001020
390998109001021
390998109001022
390998109001028
390998109001029
390998109001030

S. B. No. 259 Page 122
As Introduced
390998109001043
390998109001044
390998109002017
390998109002018
390998109002019
390998109002020
J Mahoning CRAIG BEACH 1 All
ELLSWORTH 1
ELLSWORTH 2
GOSHEN 1
GOSHEN 2
GOSHEN 3
GREEN 1
GREEN 2
GREEN 3
JACKSON 1
JACKSON 2
LOWELLVILLE 1
LOWELLVILLE 2
MILTON 1
MILTON 2
NEW MIDDLETOWN 1

S. B. No. 259 Page 123
As Introduced
NEW MIDDLETOWN 2
POLAND 1
POLAND 10
POLAND 11
POLAND 12
POLAND 13
POLAND 2
POLAND 3
POLAND 4
POLAND 5
POLAND 6
POLAND 7
POLAND 8
POLAND 9
POLAND VILLAGE 1
POLAND VILLAGE 2
POLAND VILLAGE 3
SEBRING 1
SEBRING 2
SEBRING 3
SMITH 1
SMITH 2

S. B. No. 259 Page 124
As Introduced
SMITH 3
SMITH 4
SPRINGFIELD 1
SPRINGFIELD 2
SPRINGFIELD 3
SPRINGFIELD 4
SPRINGFIELD 5
SPRINGFIELD 6
STRUTHERS 1A
STRUTHERS 1B
STRUTHERS 1C
STRUTHERS 2A
STRUTHERS 2B
STRUTHERS 2C
STRUTHERS 3A
STRUTHERS 3B
STRUTHERS 3C
STRUTHERS 4A
STRUTHERS 4B
STRUTHERS 4C
WASHINGTONVILLE 1
YOUNGSTOWN 7D

S. B. No. 259 Page 125
As Introduced
K Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 7G 390998013002017
390998013003012
390998014001002
390998014001003
390998014001004
390998014001007
390998014001008
390998014001009
390998014001010
390998014001011
390998014001013
390998014001014
390998014001015
390998014003000
390998014003001
390998014003002
390998014003003
390998014003004
390998014003007
390998014003008
390998014003011
L Monroe All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 126
As Introduced
M Portage All All
N Stark ALLIANCE 1-A All
ALLIANCE 1-B
ALLIANCE 1-C
ALLIANCE 1-D
ALLIANCE 2-A
ALLIANCE 2-B
ALLIANCE 2-C
ALLIANCE 3-A
ALLIANCE 3-B
ALLIANCE 3-C
ALLIANCE 4-A
ALLIANCE 4-B
ALLIANCE 4-C
ALLIANCE 4-D
ALLIANCE 4-E
ALLIANCE 4-F
BETHLEHEM TWP 1
BETHLEHEM TWP 2
BETHLEHEM TWP 3
BETHLEHEM TWP 4

S. B. No. 259 Page 127
As Introduced
O Stark CANTON TWP 1 391517132012006
391517132012016
391517132012018
391517132012021
391517132012022
391517132012029
391517132012030
391517132012037
391517132012042
391517132012043
391517132012044
391517132012045
391517132012047
391517132021022
391517132021023
391517132021024
391517132021051
391517132021052
391517132021053
391517132021054
391517132021055
P Stark CANTON TWP 2 All

S. B. No. 259 Page 128
As Introduced
CANTON TWP 4
CANTON TWP 5
Q Stark CANTON TWP 6 391517021003124
391517021003125
391517023002041
391517023002042
391517023002043
391517023002045
391517023002046
391517131002002
391517131002003
391517131002004
391517131002005
391517131002006
391517131002007
391517131002008
391517131002009
391517131002010
391517131002024
391517131002025
391517131002026
391517131003037

S. B. No. 259 Page 129
As Introduced
391517131003038
391517131003040
391517131003041
391517131003042
391517131003043
391517131003045
391517131003046
391517131003047
391517131003050
391517131003053
391517131003054
391517131005048
391517131005049
391517131005050
391517131005052
391517132014000
391517132014001
391517132014002
391517132014005
R Stark CANTON TWP 7 All
LAKE TWP 1
LAKE TWP 10

S. B. No. 259 Page 130
As Introduced
LAKE TWP 11
LAKE TWP 12
LAKE TWP 13
LAKE TWP 14
LAKE TWP 15
LAKE TWP 16
LAKE TWP 17
LAKE TWP 18
LAKE TWP 19
LAKE TWP 2
LAKE TWP 20
LAKE TWP 21
LAKE TWP 3
LAKE TWP 4
LAKE TWP 5
LAKE TWP 6
LAKE TWP 7
LAKE TWP 8
LAKE TWP 9
LAKE TWP A
LAKE TWP B
LEXINGTON TWP 1

S. B. No. 259 Page 131
As Introduced
LEXINGTON TWP 2
LEXINGTON TWP 3
LEXINGTON TWP 4
LOUISVILLE A
LOUISVILLE B
LOUISVILLE C
LOUISVILLE D
LOUISVILLE E
LOUISVILLE F
LOUISVILLE G
MARLBORO TWP 1
MARLBORO TWP 2
MARLBORO TWP 3
S Stark MASSILLON 5-B 391517141001043
391517141002002
391517141002003
391517141002010
391517141002018
391517141002020
391517141002021
391517141002024
391517141002025

S. B. No. 259 Page 132
As Introduced
391517144002034
391517144002035
391517144002036
391517144002037
391517144002038
391517144002039
391517144002040
391517144002042
391517144002044
391517146002010
391517146002011
391517146002012
391517146002013
391517146002014
391517146002016
391517146002017
391517146002018
391517146002019
391517146002020
391517146002021
391517146002023
391517146002024

S. B. No. 259 Page 133
As Introduced
391517146002026
391517146002035
391517146002072
391517146002078
391517147013036
391517147013037
391517147013041
391517147013046
391517147021000
391517147021005
391517148022049
T Stark NAVARRE A All
NIMISHILLEN TWP 1
NIMISHILLEN TWP 2
NIMISHILLEN TWP 3
NIMISHILLEN TWP 4
NIMISHILLEN TWP 5
NIMISHILLEN TWP 6
NIMISHILLEN TWP 7
OSNABURG TWP 1
OSNABURG TWP 2

S. B. No. 259 Page 134
As Introduced
U Stark OSNABURG TWP 3 391517124002083
391517124002084
391517124002085
391517124002086
391517124002087
391517124002100
391517125001062
391517130003000
391517130003001
391517131001003
391517131001004
391517131001005
391517131001006
391517131001007
391517131001008
391517131001009
391517131001047
391517131005000
391517131005001
391517131005002
391517131005003
391517131005004

S. B. No. 259 Page 135
As Introduced
391517131005005
391517131005006
391517131005007
391517131005029
391517131005037
391517131005039
391517131005040
391517131005041
391517131005047
391517131005051
V Stark OSNABURG TWP A All
PARIS TWP 1
PARIS TWP 2
PARIS TWP 3
PARIS TWP A
W Stark PERRY TWP 4 391517144002041
391517144002043
391517144002045
391517146002022
391517146002025
391517146002045

S. B. No. 259 Page 136
As Introduced
391517146002046
391517146002047
391517146002048
391517146002049
391517146002075
391517146002076
391517146002077
391517146002079
391517146002080
X Stark PIKE TWP 1 All
PIKE TWP 2
PIKE TWP 3
Y Stark PLAIN TWP 23 391517124002006
391517124002008
391517124002024
391517124002025
391517124002026
391517124002027
391517124002028
391517124002029
391517124002030

S. B. No. 259 Page 137
As Introduced
391517124002035
391517124002037
391517124002042
391517124002043
391517124002044
391517124002045
391517124002046
391517124002047
391517124002050
391517124002064
391517124002067
Z Stark SANDY TWP 1 All
SANDY TWP 2
SUGARCREEK TWP 1
SUGARCREEK TWP 2
SUGARCREEK TWP A
SUGARCREEK TWP B
SUGARCREEK TWP C
AA Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 2 391517147012021
391517147012022
391517147012027

S. B. No. 259 Page 138
As Introduced
391517147012028
391517147012029
391517147012033
391517147012034
391517147012040
391517147012041
391517147012042
391517147012043
391517147012044
391517147012045
391517147012046
391517147012047
391517147014003
391517147014006
391517147014007
391517147014020
391517147014021
391517147014022
391517147014023
391517147014024
391517147023009
391517147023010

S. B. No. 259 Page 139
As Introduced
391517147023011
391517147023012
391517147023013
391517147023014
391517147023015
391517147023016
391517147023018
391517147023019
391517147023020
391517147023021
391517147023022
391517147023023
391517147023024
391517147023025
391517147023026
391517147023027
391517147023028
391517147023029
391517147023031
391517147023032
391517147023033
391517147023034

S. B. No. 259 Page 140
As Introduced
391517147023035
AB Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 3 All
TUSCARAWAS TWP 4
WASHINGTON TWP 1
WASHINGTON TWP 2
WASHINGTON TWP 3
AC Tuscarawas BOLIVAR VILLAGE All
CLAY TWP
DENNISON VILLAGE 1
DENNISON VILLAGE 2
DOVER CORP 1A
DOVER CORP 1B
DOVER CORP 1C
DOVER CORP 2A
DOVER CORP 2B
DOVER CORP 2C
DOVER CORP 3A
DOVER CORP 3B
DOVER CORP 3C
DOVER CORP 4A
DOVER CORP 4B

S. B. No. 259 Page 141
As Introduced
DOVER CORP 4C
DOVER TWP 1
DOVER TWP 2
DOVER TWP 3
DOVER TWP 4 & PARRAL
FAIRFIELD TWP
FRANKLIN TWP
GNADENHUTTEN
GOSHEN TWP & ROSWELL
GOSHEN TWP 2
GOSHEN TWP 3 & BARNHILL
AD Tuscarawas GOSHEN TWP 4 391570205003118
391570205003119
391570205003120
391570205003121
391570208011000
391570208011001
391570208011002
391570208011005
391570208011012
391570208011013
391570208011014

S. B. No. 259 Page 142
As Introduced
391570208011057
391570208011061
391570208011062
391570208021002
391570208021004
391570210001027
391570210001033
391570210001034
391570210001035
391570210001036
391570210001037
391570210001038
391570210004012
391570210004014
391570210004030
391570210004040
391570210004041
391570215011000
391570215011001
391570215011003
391570215011009
391570215011010

S. B. No. 259 Page 143
As Introduced
391570215011012
391570215011015
391570215011017
391570215011018
391570215011022
391570215011046
391570215011047
391570215011048
391570215011049
391570215012005
391570215012008
391570215012013
391570215012015
391570215012017
391570215012018
391570215012019
391570215012054
391570215012055
391570215012059
391570215012060
391570215012067
391570215012069

S. B. No. 259 Page 144
As Introduced
391570215012070
391570215012071
391570215021007
391570215021008
391570215021010
391570215021012
391570215021014
391570215021015
391570215022000
391570215022001
391570215022002
391570215022003
391570215022004
391570215022005
391570215022006
391570215022007
391570215022008
391570215022011
391570215022012
391570215022013
391570215031000
391570215031001

S. B. No. 259 Page 145
As Introduced
391570215031002
391570215031003
AE Tuscarawas LAWRENCE TWP 1 All
LAWRENCE TWP 2
LAWRENCE TWP 3
LAWRENCE TWP 4
MIDVALE VILLAGE
MILL TWP
MINERAL CITY
NEW PHILADELPHIA 1A
NEW PHILADELPHIA 1B
NEW PHILADELPHIA 1C
NEW PHILADELPHIA 1D
NEW PHILADELPHIA 2A
NEW PHILADELPHIA 2B
NEW PHILADELPHIA 2C
NEW PHILADELPHIA 2D
NEW PHILADELPHIA 3A
NEW PHILADELPHIA 3B
NEW PHILADELPHIA 3C
NEW PHILADELPHIA 3D

S. B. No. 259 Page 146
As Introduced
AF Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4C 391570215011011
391570215012014
391570215012016
391570215012021
391570215012022
391570215012027
391570215012028
391570215012029
391570215012030
391570215012031
391570215012032
391570215012033
391570215012034
AG Tuscarawas NEW PHILADELPHIA 4D All
NEWCOMERSTOWN 1
NEWCOMERSTOWN 2
NEWCOMERSTOWN 3
OXFORD TWP
PERRY TWP
PORT WASHINGTON
RUSH TWP
SALEM TWP

S. B. No. 259 Page 147
As Introduced
SANDY TWP EAST
SANDY TWP WEST
STRASBURG VILLAGE 1
STRASBURG VILLAGE 2
TUSCARAWAS VILLAGE
UHRICHSVILLE WARD 1
UHRICHSVILLE WARD 2
UHRICHSVILLE WARD 3
UHRICHSVILLE WARD 4
UNION TWP
WARREN TWP
WARWICK TWP EAST
WARWICK TWP WEST
WASHINGTON TWP
WAYNE TWP & DUNDEE
AH Washington Fearing All
Independence
Lawrence
Liberty
Ludlow
Marietta 1A
Marietta 1B

S. B. No. 259 Page 148
As Introduced
AI Washington Marietta 2A 391670205002000
391670205002003
391670205002005
391670205002006
391670205002008
391670205002024
391670208003011
391670208003012
391670208003013
AJ Washington Marietta 2B All
Marietta 3A
Marietta 3B
Marietta 3C
Marietta 4C
Matamoras / Grandvie w
MTTA East A
MTTA East B
MTTA East C
MTTA East D
AK Washington MUSK East C 391670209001018
391670209002002

S. B. No. 259 Page 149
As Introduced
AL Washington Newport All
Sec. 3521.017. The seventh congressional district contain s 54
the following territory: 55
56
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Cuyahoga BAY VILLAGE-01-A All
BAY VILLAGE-01-B
BAY VILLAGE-01-C
BAY VILLAGE-02-A
BAY VILLAGE-02-B
BAY VILLAGE-02-C
BAY VILLAGE-03-A
BAY VILLAGE-03-B
BAY VILLAGE-03-C
BAY VILLAGE-04-A
BAY VILLAGE-04-B
BAY VILLAGE-04-C
BEACHWOOD-00-A
BEACHWOOD-00-B
BEACHWOOD-00-C
C Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-D 390351311051000

S. B. No. 259 Page 150
As Introduced
390351311051001
390351311051002
390351311051003
390351311051004
390351311051005
390351311051006
390351311051007
390351311051008
390351311051009
390351311051010
390351311051011
390351311052008
390351311052010
390351311052011
390351311052012
390351311052013
390351311052014
D Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-E All
BEACHWOOD-00-F
BEACHWOOD-00-G
BEACHWOOD-00-H
BEACHWOOD-00-I

S. B. No. 259 Page 151
As Introduced
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-A
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-B
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-01-C
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-02-A
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-02-B
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-03-A
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-03-B
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-04-A
BEDFORD HEIGHTS-04-B
BEDFORD-01-A
BEDFORD-01-B
BEDFORD-02-A
BEDFORD-02-B
BEDFORD-03-A
BEDFORD-03-B
BEDFORD-04-A
BEDFORD-04-B
BEDFORD-05-A
BEDFORD-06-A
BENTLEYVILLE-00-A
BEREA-01-A
BEREA-01-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 152
As Introduced
BEREA-02-A
BEREA-02-B
BEREA-02-C
BEREA-03-A
BEREA-03-B
BEREA-03-C
BEREA-04-A
BEREA-04-B
BEREA-05-A
BEREA-05-B
BEREA-05-C
BRECKSVILLE-00-A
BRECKSVILLE-00-B
BRECKSVILLE-00-C
BRECKSVILLE-00-D
BRECKSVILLE-00-E
BRECKSVILLE-00-F
BRECKSVILLE-00-G
BRECKSVILLE-00-H
BRECKSVILLE-00-I
BRECKSVILLE-00-J
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 153
As Introduced
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-B
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-01-C
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-A
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-B
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-02-C
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-A
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-B
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-C
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-03-D
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-A
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-B
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-C
BROADVIEW HEIGHTS-04-D
CHAGRIN FALLS TWP-00-A
CHAGRIN FALLS-00-A
CHAGRIN FALLS-00-B
CHAGRIN FALLS-00-C
FAIRVIEW PARK-01-A
FAIRVIEW PARK-01-B
FAIRVIEW PARK-01-C
FAIRVIEW PARK-02-A
FAIRVIEW PARK-02-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 154
As Introduced
FAIRVIEW PARK-02-C
FAIRVIEW PARK-03-A
FAIRVIEW PARK-03-B
FAIRVIEW PARK-03-C
FAIRVIEW PARK-04-A
FAIRVIEW PARK-04-B
FAIRVIEW PARK-05-A
FAIRVIEW PARK-05-B
GLENWILLOW-01-A
GLENWILLOW-02-A
GLENWILLOW-03-A
HUNTING VALLEY-00-A
INDEPENDENCE-00-A
INDEPENDENCE-00-B
INDEPENDENCE-00-C
INDEPENDENCE-00-D
INDEPENDENCE-00-E
LAKEWOOD-01-A
LAKEWOOD-01-B
LAKEWOOD-01-C
LAKEWOOD-01-D
LAKEWOOD-01-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 155
As Introduced
LAKEWOOD-01-F
LAKEWOOD-01-G
LAKEWOOD-01-H
LAKEWOOD-01-I
LAKEWOOD-02-A
LAKEWOOD-02-B
LAKEWOOD-02-C
LAKEWOOD-02-D
LAKEWOOD-02-E
LAKEWOOD-02-F
LAKEWOOD-02-G
LAKEWOOD-02-H
LAKEWOOD-02-I
LAKEWOOD-03-A
LAKEWOOD-03-B
LAKEWOOD-03-C
LAKEWOOD-03-D
LAKEWOOD-03-E
LAKEWOOD-03-F
LAKEWOOD-03-G
LAKEWOOD-03-H
LAKEWOOD-03-I

S. B. No. 259 Page 156
As Introduced
LAKEWOOD-04-A
LAKEWOOD-04-B
LAKEWOOD-04-C
LAKEWOOD-04-D
LAKEWOOD-04-E
LAKEWOOD-04-F
LAKEWOOD-04-G
LAKEWOOD-04-H
LAKEWOOD-04-I
LAKEWOOD-04-J
LYNDHURST-01-A
LYNDHURST-01-B
LYNDHURST-01-C
LYNDHURST-02-A
LYNDHURST-02-B
LYNDHURST-03-A
LYNDHURST-03-B
LYNDHURST-03-C
LYNDHURST-04-A
LYNDHURST-04-B
LYNDHURST-04-C
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 157
As Introduced
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-B
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-C
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-D
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-E
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-F
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-G
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-H
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-I
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-J
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-K
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-L
MAYFIELD HEIGHTS-00-M
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-A
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-B
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-01-C
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-A
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-B
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-02-C
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-A
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-B
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-03-C
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-04-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 158
As Introduced
MIDDLEBURG HEIGHTS-04-B
MORELAND HILLS-00-A
MORELAND HILLS-00-B
MORELAND HILLS-00-C
NORTH OLMSTEAD-03-B
NORTH OLMSTED-01-A
NORTH OLMSTED-01-B
NORTH OLMSTED-01-C
NORTH OLMSTED-01-D
NORTH OLMSTED-01-E
NORTH OLMSTED-02-A
NORTH OLMSTED-02-B
NORTH OLMSTED-02-C
NORTH OLMSTED-02-D
NORTH OLMSTED-02-E
NORTH OLMSTED-03-A
NORTH OLMSTED-03-C
NORTH OLMSTED-03-D
NORTH OLMSTED-03-E
NORTH OLMSTED-03-F
NORTH OLMSTED-04-A
NORTH OLMSTED-04-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 159
As Introduced
NORTH OLMSTED-04-C
NORTH OLMSTED-04-D
NORTH OLMSTED-04-E
NORTH ROYALTON-01-A
NORTH ROYALTON-01-B
NORTH ROYALTON-01-C
NORTH ROYALTON-02-A
NORTH ROYALTON-02-B
NORTH ROYALTON-02-C
NORTH ROYALTON-02-D
NORTH ROYALTON-03-A
NORTH ROYALTON-03-B
NORTH ROYALTON-03-C
NORTH ROYALTON-03-D
NORTH ROYALTON-04-A
NORTH ROYALTON-04-B
NORTH ROYALTON-04-C
NORTH ROYALTON-05-A
NORTH ROYALTON-05-B
NORTH ROYALTON-05-C
NORTH ROYALTON-05-D
NORTH ROYALTON-06-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 160
As Introduced
NORTH ROYALTON-06-B
NORTH ROYALTON-06-C
NORTH ROYALTON-06-D
OAKWOOD-01-A
OAKWOOD-02-A
OAKWOOD-03-A
OAKWOOD-04-A
OAKWOOD-05-A
OLMSTED FALLS-01-A
OLMSTED FALLS-01-B
OLMSTED FALLS-02-A
OLMSTED FALLS-02-B
OLMSTED FALLS-03-A
OLMSTED FALLS-03-B
OLMSTED FALLS-04-A
OLMSTED FALLS-04-B
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-A
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-B
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-C
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-D
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-E
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 161
As Introduced
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-G
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-H
OLMSTED TOWNSHIP-00-I
ORANGE-00-A
ORANGE-00-B
ORANGE-00-C
PEPPER PIKE-00-A
PEPPER PIKE-00-B
PEPPER PIKE-00-C
PEPPER PIKE-00-D
PEPPER PIKE-00-E
ROCKY RIVER-01-A
ROCKY RIVER-01-B
ROCKY RIVER-01-C
ROCKY RIVER-01-D
ROCKY RIVER-02-A
ROCKY RIVER-02-B
ROCKY RIVER-02-C
ROCKY RIVER-02-D
ROCKY RIVER-03-A
ROCKY RIVER-03-B
ROCKY RIVER-03-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 162
As Introduced
ROCKY RIVER-03-D
ROCKY RIVER-04-A
ROCKY RIVER-04-B
ROCKY RIVER-04-C
ROCKY RIVER-04-D
SOLON-01-A
SOLON-01-B
SOLON-02-A
SOLON-02-B
SOLON-03-A
SOLON-03-B
SOLON-04-A
SOLON-04-B
SOLON-04-C
SOLON-05-A
SOLON-05-B
SOLON-06-A
SOLON-06-B
SOLON-07-A
SOLON-07-B
E Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-C 390351851031007
390351851031009

S. B. No. 259 Page 163
As Introduced
F Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-D All
SOUTH EUCLID-03-D
G Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-04-D 390351852033000
390351852033002
H Cuyahoga STRONGSVILLE-01-A All
STRONGSVILLE-01-B
STRONGSVILLE-01-C
STRONGSVILLE-01-D
STRONGSVILLE-01-E
STRONGSVILLE-01-F
STRONGSVILLE-01-G
STRONGSVILLE-02-A
STRONGSVILLE-02-B
STRONGSVILLE-02-C
STRONGSVILLE-02-D
STRONGSVILLE-02-E
STRONGSVILLE-02-F
STRONGSVILLE-02-G
STRONGSVILLE-02-H
STRONGSVILLE-02-I
STRONGSVILLE-03-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 164
As Introduced
STRONGSVILLE-03-B
STRONGSVILLE-03-C
STRONGSVILLE-03-D
STRONGSVILLE-03-E
STRONGSVILLE-03-F
STRONGSVILLE-03-G
STRONGSVILLE-04-A
STRONGSVILLE-04-B
STRONGSVILLE-04-C
STRONGSVILLE-04-D
STRONGSVILLE-04-E
STRONGSVILLE-04-F
STRONGSVILLE-04-G
VALLEY VIEW-00-A
VALLEY VIEW-00-B
WALTON HILLS-00-A
WALTON HILLS-00-B
WESTLAKE-01-A
WESTLAKE-01-B
WESTLAKE-01-C
WESTLAKE-01-D
WESTLAKE-02-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 165
As Introduced
WESTLAKE-02-B
WESTLAKE-02-C
WESTLAKE-02-D
WESTLAKE-03-A
WESTLAKE-03-B
WESTLAKE-03-C
WESTLAKE-03-D
WESTLAKE-04-A
WESTLAKE-04-B
WESTLAKE-04-C
WESTLAKE-04-D
WESTLAKE-05-A
WESTLAKE-05-B
WESTLAKE-05-C
WESTLAKE-05-D
WESTLAKE-06-A
WESTLAKE-06-B
WESTLAKE-06-C
WESTLAKE-06-D
WOODMERE-00-A
I Lorain AVON CITY 1-A All
AVON CITY 1-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 166
As Introduced
AVON CITY 1-C
AVON CITY 1-D
AVON CITY 1-E
AVON CITY 2-A
AVON CITY 2-B
AVON CITY 2-C
AVON CITY 3-A
AVON CITY 3-B
AVON CITY 3-C
AVON CITY 4-A
AVON CITY 4-B
AVON CITY 4-C
AVON LAKE CITY 1-A
AVON LAKE CITY 1-B
AVON LAKE CITY 1-C
AVON LAKE CITY 1-D
AVON LAKE CITY 2-A
AVON LAKE CITY 2-B
AVON LAKE CITY 2-C
AVON LAKE CITY 2-D
AVON LAKE CITY 3-A
AVON LAKE CITY 3-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 167
As Introduced
AVON LAKE CITY 3-C
J Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-A 390930104001004
390930104001006
390930104001007
390930104001008
390930104001009
390930104001010
390930104001013
390930104001014
390930104001015
390930104001016
390930104001017
390930104001022
390930104001023
390930104001024
390930104001025
390930104001026
390930104001027
390930104002000
390930104002001
390930104002002
390930104002003

S. B. No. 259 Page 168
As Introduced
K Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-B All
AVON LAKE CITY 4-C
AVON LAKE CITY 4-D
ELYRIA CITY 1-A
ELYRIA CITY 1-B
ELYRIA CITY 1-C
ELYRIA CITY 1-D
ELYRIA CITY 2-A
ELYRIA CITY 2-B
ELYRIA CITY 2-C
ELYRIA CITY 2-D
ELYRIA CITY 3-B
ELYRIA CITY 4-A
ELYRIA CITY 4-B
ELYRIA CITY 4-C
ELYRIA CITY 4-D
ELYRIA CITY 4-E
L Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-A 390930976001000
390930976001001
390930976001006
390930976001010
390930976001011

S. B. No. 259 Page 169
As Introduced
390930976003000
390930976003001
390930976003002
390930976003003
390930976003004
390930976003005
390930976003006
390930976003007
390930976004000
390930976004001
390930976004002
390930976004003
390930976004005
390930976004006
390930976004007
390930976004008
390930976004009
390930976004010
390930976004011
390930976004012
390930976004013
390930976004014

S. B. No. 259 Page 170
As Introduced
390930976004015
390930976004016
390930976004023
390930976004025
390930976004026
390930976004027
390930976004029
390930976004042
M Lorain ELYRIA CITY 6-A All
ELYRIA CITY 6-B
ELYRIA CITY 6-D
ELYRIA CITY 7-A
ELYRIA CITY 7-B
ELYRIA CITY 7-C
ELYRIA CITY 7-D
ELYRIA CITY 7-E
ELYRIA TWP #1
ELYRIA TWP #2
N. RIDGEVILLE 1-A
N. RIDGEVILLE 1-B
N. RIDGEVILLE 1-C
N. RIDGEVILLE 1-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 171
As Introduced
N. RIDGEVILLE 1-E
N. RIDGEVILLE 2-A
N. RIDGEVILLE 2-B
N. RIDGEVILLE 2-C
N. RIDGEVILLE 2-D
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-A
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-B
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-C
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-D
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-E
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-F
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-G
N. RIDGEVILLE 3-H
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-A
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-B
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-C
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-D
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-E
N. RIDGEVILLE 4-F
N Medina All All
Sec. 3521.018. The eighth congressional district contains 57
the following territory: 58

S. B. No. 259 Page 172
As Introduced
59
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Butler All All
C Darke All All
D Miami CONCORD EAST All
CONCORD NORTH
CONCORD SOUTH
CONCORD SOUTH EAST
CONCORD WEST
LAURA
LUDLOW CENTRAL
E Miami MONROE EAST CENTRAL 391093501014001
391093501014002
391093501014003
391093501014005
391093501014006
391093501014007
391093501014008
391093501014009
391093501014010

S. B. No. 259 Page 173
As Introduced
391093501014011
391093501014013
391093501014014
391093501014015
391093501014020
391093501014022
391093501021040
391093550011017
391093550011020
391093550022029
391093550022030
391093550022035
391093550022042
391093550022043
F Miami MONROE NORTH EAST All
MONROE SOUTH
MONROE SOUTH EAST
MONROE WEST
NEWTON EAST
NEWTON WEST
PLEASANT HILL
POTSDAM

S. B. No. 259 Page 174
As Introduced
STAUNTON NORTH
STAUNTON SOUTH
TIPP CITY A
TIPP CITY B
TIPP CITY C
G Miami TIPP CITY D 391093550011023
391093550011026
391093550012006
391093550012007
391093550012010
391093550012011
391093550012012
391093550012013
391093550012014
391093550012015
391093550013004
391093550013005
391093550014000
391093550014001
391093550014004
H Miami TIPP CITY E All

S. B. No. 259 Page 175
As Introduced
TIPP CITY F
I Miami TIPP CITY G 391093501013000
391093501013004
391093550013007
391093550013011
391093550013012
391093550021028
391093550021030
391093550022008
391093550022009
391093550022019
391093550022020
391093550022021
391093550022028
391093550022031
391093550022032
391093550022033
391093550022034
391093550022038
391093550022039
J Miami TROY 1-A All

S. B. No. 259 Page 176
As Introduced
TROY 1-B
TROY 1-C
TROY 1-D
TROY 2-A
TROY 2-B
TROY 2-C
TROY 3-A
TROY 3-B
TROY 3-C
TROY 3-D
TROY 4-A
TROY 4-B
TROY 4-C
TROY 5-A
TROY 5-B
TROY 5-C
TROY 6-A
TROY 6-B
TROY 6-C
TROY 6-D
UNION EAST
UNION SOUTH CENTRAL

S. B. No. 259 Page 177
As Introduced
WEST MILTON A
WEST MILTON B
WEST MILTON C
K Preble All All
L Warren All All
Sec. 3521.019. The ninth congressional district contains 60
the following territory: 61
62
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Erie All All
C Lorain AMHERST CITY 1-A All
AMHERST CITY 1-B
AMHERST CITY 2-A
AMHERST CITY 2-B
AMHERST CITY 2-C
AMHERST CITY 3-A
AMHERST CITY 3-B
AMHERST CITY 4-A
AMHERST CITY 4-B
AMHERST TWP #1

S. B. No. 259 Page 178
As Introduced
AMHERST TWP #2
AMHERST TWP #3
AMHERST TWP #4
D Lorain AVON LAKE CITY 4-A 390930104001005
E Lorain BRIGHTON TWP All
BROWNHELM TWP
CARLISLE TWP #1
CARLISLE TWP #2
CARLISLE TWP #3
CARLISLE TWP #4
CARLISLE TWP #5
COLUMBIA TWP #1
COLUMBIA TWP #2
COLUMBIA TWP #3
COLUMBIA TWP #4
EATON TWP #1
EATON TWP #2
EATON TWP #3
ELYRIA CITY 3-A
ELYRIA CITY 3-C
ELYRIA CITY 3-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 179
As Introduced
ELYRIA CITY 3-E
F Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-A 390930976001002
390930976001003
390930976001004
390930976001005
390930976001008
390930976001009
390930976002009
390930976004004
390930976004017
390930976004018
390930976004019
390930976004020
390930976004021
390930976004022
390930976004024
390930976004028
390930976004030
390930976004031
390930976004032
390930976004033
390930976004034

S. B. No. 259 Page 180
As Introduced
390930976004035
390930976004036
390930976004037
390930976004038
390930976004039
390930976004040
390930976004041
G Lorain ELYRIA CITY 5-B All
ELYRIA CITY 5-C
ELYRIA CITY 5-D
ELYRIA CITY 6-C
GRAFTON TWP #1
GRAFTON TWP #2
GRAFTON VILL #1/#2
GRAFTON VILL #3/#4
HENRIETTA TWP
HUNTINGTON TWP
LAGRANGE TWP #1
LAGRANGE TWP #2
LAGRANGE VILL
LORAIN CITY 1-A
LORAIN CITY 1-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 181
As Introduced
LORAIN CITY 1-C
LORAIN CITY 1-D
LORAIN CITY 1-E
LORAIN CITY 2-A
LORAIN CITY 2-B
LORAIN CITY 2-C
LORAIN CITY 2-D
LORAIN CITY 2-E
LORAIN CITY 2-F
LORAIN CITY 3-A
LORAIN CITY 3-B
LORAIN CITY 3-C
LORAIN CITY 3-D
LORAIN CITY 3-E
LORAIN CITY 4-A
LORAIN CITY 4-B
LORAIN CITY 4-C
LORAIN CITY 4-D
LORAIN CITY 4-E
LORAIN CITY 4-F
LORAIN CITY 5-A
LORAIN CITY 5-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 182
As Introduced
LORAIN CITY 5-C
LORAIN CITY 5-D
LORAIN CITY 6-A
LORAIN CITY 6-B
LORAIN CITY 6-C
LORAIN CITY 6-D
LORAIN CITY 7-A
LORAIN CITY 7-B
LORAIN CITY 7-C
LORAIN CITY 7-D
LORAIN CITY 7-E
LORAIN CITY 8-A
LORAIN CITY 8-B
LORAIN CITY 8-C
LORAIN CITY 8-D
LORAIN CITY 8-E
LORAIN CITY 8-F
NEW RUSSIA TWP
OBERLIN CITY #1
OBERLIN CITY #2
OBERLIN CITY #3
OBERLIN CITY #4

S. B. No. 259 Page 183
As Introduced
OBERLIN CITY #5
OBERLIN CITY #6
OBERLIN CITY #7
OBERLIN CITY #8
PENFIELD TWP
PITTSFIELD TWP
PRECINCT CAMDEN TWP/KIPTON VILL
PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP EAST
PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP NORTH
PRECINCT SHEFFIELD TWP WEST
ROCHESTER TWP & VILL
S AMHERST VILL
SHEF. LAKE CITY 1-A
SHEF. LAKE CITY 2-A
SHEF. LAKE CITY 3-A
SHEF. LAKE CITY 4-A
SHEFFIELD VILL #1
SHEFFIELD VILL #2
SHEFFIELD VILL #3
VERMILION CITY 1-A
VERMILION CITY 3-A/5-A
VERMILION CITY 4-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 184
As Introduced
VERMILION CITY 5-B
WELLINGTON TWP
WELLINGTON VILL NORTH
WELLINGTON VILL SOUTH
H Lucas All All
I Ottawa All All
J Wood LAKE TWP EAST All
LAKE TWP LATCHA
LAKE TWP MILLBURY
LAKE TWP NORTH
LAKE TWP UNION
LAKE TWP WALBRIDGE A
LAKE TWP WALBRIDGE B
NORTHWOOD A
NORTHWOOD B
NORTHWOOD D
PERRYSBURG A
PERRYSBURG B
K Wood PERRYSBURG E 391730204012035
391730204013030
391730204013031

S. B. No. 259 Page 185
As Introduced
391730204013032
391730204013033
391730204021007
391730204021008
391730204021010
391730204021011
391730204021013
391730204021014
391730204021017
391730205002009
391730205002010
391730205002011
391730205002012
391730205002022
391730205002023
391730205002024
391730205002025
L Wood PERRYSBURG M All
PERRYSBURG N
M Wood PERRYSBURG O 391730204021000
391730204021001

S. B. No. 259 Page 186
As Introduced
391730204021002
391730204021003
391730204021004
391730204021005
391730204021018
391730204021022
391730204021023
N Wood PERRYSBURG P All
PERRYSBURG T
PERRYSBURG TWP BELMONT
PERRYSBURG TWP ECKEL
PERRYSBURG TWP FORD
O Wood PERRYSBURG TWP FT MEIGS 391730204022056
391730206011058
391730206011059
391730206021000
391730206021003
391730206021005
391730206021019
391730206021020
391730206021021

S. B. No. 259 Page 187
As Introduced
391730206021022
391730206021023
391730206023000
391730206023001
391730206023002
391730206023003
391730206023004
391730206023006
391730206023007
391730206023008
391730206023021
391730206023022
391730206023023
391730206023027
391730206023029
391730206023031
391730206024006
391730206024042
391730207022022
391730207022023
391730207022024
391730207022028

S. B. No. 259 Page 188
As Introduced
391730207023017
391730207023018
391730207023024
391730207023026
391730207023028
391730207023029
391730207023036
391730212001073
P Wood PERRYSBURG TWP GLENWOOD All
PERRYSBURG TWP HAMLET
PERRYSBURG TWP NORTH
PERRYSBURG TWP SOUTH
PERRYSBURG U
PERRYSBURG V
PERRYSBURG W
Q Wood PERRYSBURG X 391730206024001
391730206024002
391730206024005
391730206024007
391730206024008
391730206024009

S. B. No. 259 Page 189
As Introduced
391730206024010
391730206024012
391730206024013
R Wood PERRYSBURG Y All
PRBG TWP FALLEN TIMBERS
PRBG TWP STARBRIGHT
ROSSFORD A
ROSSFORD D
ROSSFORD F
ROSSFORD H
ROSSFORD I
Sec. 3521.0110. The tenth congressional district contains 63
the following territory: 64
65
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Clark BETH 1 All
BETH 2
BETH 3
BETH 4
BETH 5
BETH 6

S. B. No. 259 Page 190
As Introduced
BETH 7
BETH 8
BETH 9
CARL 1
CARL 2
CARL 3
CITY 1
CITY 10
CITY 12
CITY 13
CITY 14
CITY 18
CITY 19
CITY 2
CITY 20
CITY 21
CITY 22
CITY 23
CITY 24
C Clark CITY 25 390230007001000
390230007001001
390230007001002

S. B. No. 259 Page 191
As Introduced
390230007001003
390230007001004
390230007001005
390230007001006
390230007001007
390230007001008
390230007001009
390230007001010
390230007001011
390230007001012
390230007002000
390230007002001
390230007002002
390230007002003
390230007002008
390230007002009
390230007002010
390230007002011
390230007002012
390230007002013
390230007002014
390230007002015

S. B. No. 259 Page 192
As Introduced
390230007002016
390230007002017
390230007002018
390230007002019
390230007002020
390230007002021
390230007002022
390230007003000
390230007003001
390230007003002
390230007003003
390230007003004
390230007003005
390230007003006
390230007003007
390230007003008
390230007003009
390230007003010
390230007003011
390230007003012
390230007003013
390230034003000

S. B. No. 259 Page 193
As Introduced
390230034003001
D Clark CITY 28 All
CITY 29
CITY 3
CITY 30
CITY 4
CITY 5
CITY 6
CITY 7
CITY 8
CITY 9
ENON 1
ENON 2
GREE 1
GREE 2
MR-1
MR-2
MR-3
MR-4
MR-5
MR-6
T-3

S. B. No. 259 Page 194
As Introduced
T-4
T-5
T-6
T-7
T-8
E Greene All All
F Montgomery All All
Sec. 3521.0111. The eleventh congressional district 66
contains the following territory: 67
68
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Cuyahoga BEACHWOOD-00-D 390351833004019
390351835011006
390351835011009
C Cuyahoga BRATENAHL-00-A All
BROOK PARK-01-A
BROOK PARK-01-B
BROOK PARK-01-C
BROOK PARK-02-A
BROOK PARK-02-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 195
As Introduced
BROOK PARK-02-C
BROOK PARK-03-A
BROOK PARK-03-B
BROOK PARK-03-C
BROOK PARK-04-A
BROOK PARK-04-B
BROOK PARK-04-C
BROOKLYN HEIGHTS-00-A
BROOKLYN-00-A
BROOKLYN-00-B
BROOKLYN-00-C
BROOKLYN-00-D
BROOKLYN-00-E
BROOKLYN-00-F
BROOKLYN-00-G
BROOKLYN-00-H
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-A
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-B
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-C
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-D
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-E
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-01-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 196
As Introduced
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-A
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-B
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-C
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-D
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-E
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-02-F
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-A
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-B
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-C
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-D
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-E
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-03-F
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-A
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-B
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-C
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-D
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-E
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-F
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-G
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-H
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-04-I
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 197
As Introduced
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-B
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-C
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-D
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-E
CLEVELAND HEIGHTS-05-F
CLEVELAND-01-A
CLEVELAND-01-B
CLEVELAND-01-C
CLEVELAND-01-D
CLEVELAND-01-E
CLEVELAND-01-F
CLEVELAND-01-G
CLEVELAND-01-H
CLEVELAND-01-I
CLEVELAND-01-J
CLEVELAND-01-K
CLEVELAND-01-L
CLEVELAND-01-M
CLEVELAND-01-N
CLEVELAND-01-O
CLEVELAND-01-P
CLEVELAND-01-Q

S. B. No. 259 Page 198
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-01-R
CLEVELAND-01-S
CLEVELAND-01-T
CLEVELAND-02-A
CLEVELAND-02-B
CLEVELAND-02-C
CLEVELAND-02-D
CLEVELAND-02-E
CLEVELAND-02-F
CLEVELAND-02-G
CLEVELAND-02-H
CLEVELAND-02-I
CLEVELAND-02-J
CLEVELAND-02-K
CLEVELAND-02-L
CLEVELAND-02-M
CLEVELAND-02-N
CLEVELAND-02-O
CLEVELAND-02-P
CLEVELAND-02-Q
CLEVELAND-02-R
CLEVELAND-02-S

S. B. No. 259 Page 199
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-02-T
CLEVELAND-02-U
CLEVELAND-02-V
CLEVELAND-02-W
CLEVELAND-03-A
CLEVELAND-03-B
CLEVELAND-03-C
CLEVELAND-03-D
CLEVELAND-03-E
CLEVELAND-03-F
CLEVELAND-03-G
CLEVELAND-03-H
CLEVELAND-03-I
CLEVELAND-03-J
CLEVELAND-03-K
CLEVELAND-03-L
CLEVELAND-03-M
CLEVELAND-03-N
CLEVELAND-03-O
CLEVELAND-03-P
CLEVELAND-03-Q
CLEVELAND-03-R

S. B. No. 259 Page 200
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-03-S
CLEVELAND-04-A
CLEVELAND-04-B
CLEVELAND-04-C
CLEVELAND-04-D
CLEVELAND-04-E
CLEVELAND-04-F
CLEVELAND-04-G
CLEVELAND-04-H
CLEVELAND-04-I
CLEVELAND-04-J
CLEVELAND-04-K
CLEVELAND-04-L
CLEVELAND-04-M
CLEVELAND-04-N
CLEVELAND-04-O
CLEVELAND-04-P
CLEVELAND-04-Q
CLEVELAND-04-R
CLEVELAND-04-S
CLEVELAND-04-T
CLEVELAND-04-U

S. B. No. 259 Page 201
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-05-A
CLEVELAND-05-B
CLEVELAND-05-C
CLEVELAND-05-D
CLEVELAND-05-E
CLEVELAND-05-F
CLEVELAND-05-G
CLEVELAND-05-H
CLEVELAND-05-I
CLEVELAND-05-J
CLEVELAND-05-K
CLEVELAND-05-L
CLEVELAND-05-M
CLEVELAND-05-N
CLEVELAND-05-O
CLEVELAND-05-P
CLEVELAND-05-Q
CLEVELAND-05-R
CLEVELAND-05-S
CLEVELAND-06-A
CLEVELAND-06-B
CLEVELAND-06-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 202
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-06-D
CLEVELAND-06-E
CLEVELAND-06-F
CLEVELAND-06-G
CLEVELAND-06-H
CLEVELAND-06-I
CLEVELAND-06-J
CLEVELAND-06-K
CLEVELAND-06-L
CLEVELAND-06-M
CLEVELAND-06-N
CLEVELAND-06-O
CLEVELAND-06-P
CLEVELAND-06-Q
CLEVELAND-06-R
CLEVELAND-06-S
CLEVELAND-06-T
CLEVELAND-06-U
CLEVELAND-07-A
CLEVELAND-07-B
CLEVELAND-07-C
CLEVELAND-07-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 203
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-07-E
CLEVELAND-07-F
CLEVELAND-07-G
CLEVELAND-07-H
CLEVELAND-07-I
CLEVELAND-07-J
CLEVELAND-07-K
CLEVELAND-07-L
CLEVELAND-07-M
CLEVELAND-07-N
CLEVELAND-07-O
CLEVELAND-07-P
CLEVELAND-07-Q
CLEVELAND-07-R
CLEVELAND-07-S
CLEVELAND-07-T
CLEVELAND-07-U
CLEVELAND-07-V
CLEVELAND-07-W
CLEVELAND-08-A
CLEVELAND-08-B
CLEVELAND-08-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 204
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-08-D
CLEVELAND-08-E
CLEVELAND-08-F
CLEVELAND-08-G
CLEVELAND-08-H
CLEVELAND-08-I
CLEVELAND-08-J
CLEVELAND-08-K
CLEVELAND-08-L
CLEVELAND-08-M
CLEVELAND-08-N
CLEVELAND-08-O
CLEVELAND-08-P
CLEVELAND-08-Q
CLEVELAND-08-R
CLEVELAND-09-A
CLEVELAND-09-B
CLEVELAND-09-C
CLEVELAND-09-D
CLEVELAND-09-E
CLEVELAND-09-F
CLEVELAND-09-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 205
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-09-H
CLEVELAND-09-I
CLEVELAND-09-J
CLEVELAND-09-K
CLEVELAND-09-L
CLEVELAND-09-M
CLEVELAND-09-N
CLEVELAND-09-O
CLEVELAND-09-P
CLEVELAND-09-Q
CLEVELAND-09-R
CLEVELAND-09-S
CLEVELAND-09-T
CLEVELAND-09-U
CLEVELAND-09-V
CLEVELAND-09-W
CLEVELAND-09-X
CLEVELAND-10-A
CLEVELAND-10-B
CLEVELAND-10-C
CLEVELAND-10-D
CLEVELAND-10-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 206
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-10-F
CLEVELAND-10-G
CLEVELAND-10-H
CLEVELAND-10-I
CLEVELAND-10-J
CLEVELAND-10-K
CLEVELAND-10-L
CLEVELAND-10-M
CLEVELAND-10-N
CLEVELAND-10-O
CLEVELAND-10-P
CLEVELAND-10-Q
CLEVELAND-10-R
CLEVELAND-10-S
CLEVELAND-10-T
CLEVELAND-10-U
CLEVELAND-10-V
CLEVELAND-11-A
CLEVELAND-11-B
CLEVELAND-11-C
CLEVELAND-11-D
CLEVELAND-11-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 207
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-11-F
CLEVELAND-11-G
CLEVELAND-11-H
CLEVELAND-11-I
CLEVELAND-11-J
CLEVELAND-11-K
CLEVELAND-11-L
CLEVELAND-11-M
CLEVELAND-11-N
CLEVELAND-11-O
CLEVELAND-11-P
CLEVELAND-12-A
CLEVELAND-12-B
CLEVELAND-12-C
CLEVELAND-12-D
CLEVELAND-12-E
CLEVELAND-12-F
CLEVELAND-12-G
CLEVELAND-12-H
CLEVELAND-12-I
CLEVELAND-12-J
CLEVELAND-12-K

S. B. No. 259 Page 208
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-12-L
CLEVELAND-12-M
CLEVELAND-12-N
CLEVELAND-12-O
CLEVELAND-12-P
CLEVELAND-12-Q
CLEVELAND-12-R
CLEVELAND-12-S
CLEVELAND-13-A
CLEVELAND-13-B
CLEVELAND-13-C
CLEVELAND-13-D
CLEVELAND-13-E
CLEVELAND-13-F
CLEVELAND-13-G
CLEVELAND-13-H
CLEVELAND-13-I
CLEVELAND-13-J
CLEVELAND-13-K
CLEVELAND-13-L
CLEVELAND-13-M
CLEVELAND-13-N

S. B. No. 259 Page 209
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-13-O
CLEVELAND-13-P
CLEVELAND-13-Q
CLEVELAND-14-A
CLEVELAND-14-B
CLEVELAND-14-C
CLEVELAND-14-D
CLEVELAND-14-E
CLEVELAND-14-F
CLEVELAND-14-G
CLEVELAND-14-H
CLEVELAND-14-I
CLEVELAND-14-J
CLEVELAND-14-K
CLEVELAND-14-L
CLEVELAND-14-M
CLEVELAND-14-N
CLEVELAND-14-O
CLEVELAND-14-P
CLEVELAND-15-A
CLEVELAND-15-B
CLEVELAND-15-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 210
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-15-D
CLEVELAND-15-E
CLEVELAND-15-F
CLEVELAND-15-G
CLEVELAND-15-H
CLEVELAND-15-I
CLEVELAND-15-J
CLEVELAND-15-K
CLEVELAND-15-L
CLEVELAND-15-M
CLEVELAND-15-N
CLEVELAND-15-O
CLEVELAND-15-P
CLEVELAND-15-Q
CLEVELAND-15-R
CLEVELAND-16-A
CLEVELAND-16-B
CLEVELAND-16-C
CLEVELAND-16-D
CLEVELAND-16-E
CLEVELAND-16-F
CLEVELAND-16-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 211
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-16-H
CLEVELAND-16-I
CLEVELAND-16-J
CLEVELAND-16-K
CLEVELAND-16-L
CLEVELAND-16-M
CLEVELAND-16-N
CLEVELAND-16-O
CLEVELAND-16-P
CLEVELAND-16-Q
CLEVELAND-17-A
CLEVELAND-17-B
CLEVELAND-17-C
CLEVELAND-17-D
CLEVELAND-17-E
CLEVELAND-17-F
CLEVELAND-17-G
CLEVELAND-17-H
CLEVELAND-17-I
CLEVELAND-17-J
CLEVELAND-17-K
CLEVELAND-17-L

S. B. No. 259 Page 212
As Introduced
CLEVELAND-17-M
CLEVELAND-17-N
CLEVELAND-17-O
CLEVELAND-17-P
CLEVELAND-17-Q
CLEVELAND-17-R
CLEVELAND-17-S
CUYAHOGA HEIGHTS-00-A
EAST CLEVELAND-02-A
EAST CLEVELAND-02-B
EAST CLEVELAND-02-C
EAST CLEVELAND-02-D
EAST CLEVELAND-03-A
EAST CLEVELAND-03-B
EAST CLEVELAND-03-C
EAST CLEVELAND-03-D
EAST CLEVELAND-03-E
EAST CLEVELAND-04-A
EAST CLEVELAND-04-B
EAST CLEVELAND-04-C
EAST CLEVELAND-04-D
EAST CLEVELAND-04-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 213
As Introduced
EAST CLEVELAND-04-F
EUCLID-01-A
EUCLID-01-B
EUCLID-01-C
EUCLID-01-D
EUCLID-01-E
EUCLID-02-A
EUCLID-02-B
EUCLID-02-C
EUCLID-02-D
EUCLID-03-A
EUCLID-03-B
EUCLID-03-C
EUCLID-03-D
EUCLID-03-E
EUCLID-04-A
EUCLID-04-B
EUCLID-04-C
EUCLID-04-D
EUCLID-04-E
EUCLID-05-A
EUCLID-05-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 214
As Introduced
EUCLID-05-C
EUCLID-05-D
EUCLID-05-E
EUCLID-06-A
EUCLID-06-B
EUCLID-06-C
EUCLID-06-D
EUCLID-06-E
EUCLID-07-A
EUCLID-07-B
EUCLID-07-C
EUCLID-07-D
EUCLID-07-E
EUCLID-08-A
EUCLID-08-B
EUCLID-08-C
EUCLID-08-D
EUCLID-08-E
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-01-C
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 215
As Introduced
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-02-C
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-03-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-03-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-04-C
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-05-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-05-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-06-C
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-A
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-B
GARFIELD HEIGHTS-07-C
GATES MILLS-00-A
GATES MILLS-00-B
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-01-A
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-01-B
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-02-A
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-02-B
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-03-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 216
As Introduced
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-03-B
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-04-A
HIGHLAND HEIGHTS-04-B
HIGHLAND HILLS-00-A
LINNDALE-00-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-01-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-01-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-02-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-02-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-03-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-03-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-04-C
MAPLE HEIGHTS-05-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-05-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-06-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-06-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-A
MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-B
MAPLE HEIGHTS-07-C
MAYFIELD VILLAGE-01-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 217
As Introduced
MAYFIELD VILLAGE-02-A
MAYFIELD VILLAGE-03-A
MAYFIELD VILLAGE-04-A
NEWBURGH HEIGHTS-00-A
NORTH RANDALL-00-A
PARMA HEIGHTS-01-A
PARMA HEIGHTS-01-B
PARMA HEIGHTS-01-C
PARMA HEIGHTS-02-A
PARMA HEIGHTS-02-B
PARMA HEIGHTS-02-C
PARMA HEIGHTS-03-A
PARMA HEIGHTS-03-B
PARMA HEIGHTS-03-C
PARMA HEIGHTS-04-A
PARMA HEIGHTS-04-B
PARMA HEIGHTS-04-C
PARMA-01-A
PARMA-01-B
PARMA-01-C
PARMA-01-D
PARMA-01-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 218
As Introduced
PARMA-01-F
PARMA-02-A
PARMA-02-B
PARMA-02-C
PARMA-02-D
PARMA-02-E
PARMA-03-A
PARMA-03-B
PARMA-03-C
PARMA-03-D
PARMA-03-E
PARMA-03-F
PARMA-04-A
PARMA-04-B
PARMA-04-C
PARMA-04-D
PARMA-04-E
PARMA-05-A
PARMA-05-B
PARMA-05-C
PARMA-05-D
PARMA-05-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 219
As Introduced
PARMA-05-F
PARMA-06-A
PARMA-06-B
PARMA-06-C
PARMA-06-D
PARMA-06-E
PARMA-06-F
PARMA-07-A
PARMA-07-B
PARMA-07-C
PARMA-07-D
PARMA-07-E
PARMA-07-F
PARMA-08-A
PARMA-08-B
PARMA-08-C
PARMA-08-D
PARMA-08-E
PARMA-09-A
PARMA-09-B
PARMA-09-C
PARMA-09-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 220
As Introduced
PARMA-09-E
PARMA-09-F
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-01-A
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-01-B
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-02-A
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-02-B
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-A
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-B
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-03-C
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-04-A
RICHMOND HEIGHTS-04-B
SEVEN HILLS-01-A
SEVEN HILLS-01-B
SEVEN HILLS-02-A
SEVEN HILLS-02-B
SEVEN HILLS-03-A
SEVEN HILLS-03-B
SEVEN HILLS-04-A
SEVEN HILLS-04-B
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-A
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-B
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 221
As Introduced
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-D
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-E
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-F
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-G
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-H
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-I
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-J
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-K
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-L
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-M
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-N
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-O
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-P
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-Q
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-R
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-S
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-T
SHAKER HEIGHTS-00-U
SOUTH EUCLID-01-A
SOUTH EUCLID-01-B
SOUTH EUCLID-01-C
SOUTH EUCLID-01-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 222
As Introduced
SOUTH EUCLID-02-A
SOUTH EUCLID-02-B
D Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-02-C 390351851021001
390351851021002
390351851021003
390351851021006
390351851021007
390351851023007
390351851031000
390351851031001
390351851031002
390351851031003
390351851031004
390351851031005
390351851031006
390351851031008
390351851032000
E Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-03-A All
SOUTH EUCLID-03-B
SOUTH EUCLID-03-C
SOUTH EUCLID-04-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 223
As Introduced
SOUTH EUCLID-04-B
SOUTH EUCLID-04-C
F Cuyahoga SOUTH EUCLID-04-D 390351852032008
390351852033001
390351852033003
390351852033004
390351852033005
390351852033006
390351852033007
390351852033008
390351852033009
390351852033010
390351852033011
390351852033012
390351852033013
390351852033014
390351852033015
390351852033016
390351852033017
G Cuyahoga UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-A All
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 224
As Introduced
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-C
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-D
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-E
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-F
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-G
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-H
UNIVERSITY HEIGHTS-00-I
WARRENSVILLE HTS-01-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-01-B
WARRENSVILLE HTS-02-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-02-B
WARRENSVILLE HTS-03-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-04-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-04-B
WARRENSVILLE HTS-05-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-05-B
WARRENSVILLE HTS-06-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-07-A
WARRENSVILLE HTS-07-B
Sec. 3521.0112. The twelfth congressional district 69
contains the following territory: 70
71

S. B. No. 259 Page 225
As Introduced
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Athens All All
C Delaware ASHLEY All
BERKSHIRE A
BERKSHIRE B
BERKSHIRE C
BERKSHIRE D
BERKSHIRE E
BROWN
D Delaware DELAWARE 4-F 390410111021067
390410111021074
390410111021075
390410111021084
390410111021085
390410111021086
390410111021087
390410122001000
390410122001001
390410122001002
390410122001004

S. B. No. 259 Page 226
As Introduced
390410122001005
390410122001006
390410122001007
390410122001008
390410122001009
390410122001010
390410122001011
390410122001012
E Delaware DELAWARE 4-G 390410102003037
390410102003048
390410102003049
390410111021069
390410111021070
390410111021071
390410111021072
390410111021073
390410111021076
F Delaware DELAWARE TWP A 390410102003036
390410102003038
G Delaware GALENA All
HARLEM A

S. B. No. 259 Page 227
As Introduced
HARLEM B
HARLEM C
HARLEM D
KINGSTON A
KINGSTON B
OXFORD
PORTER A
PORTER B
SUNBURY A
SUNBURY B
SUNBURY C
SUNBURY D
TRENTON A
TRENTON B
H Fairfield All All
I Gallia All All
J Hocking All All
K Jackson PRECINCT BLOOMFIELD All
PRECINCT COAL I
PRECINCT COAL II
PRECINCT FRANKLIN I

S. B. No. 259 Page 228
As Introduced
PRECINCT FRANKLIN II
PRECINCT JACKSON 1-A
L Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 2-A 390799575001002
390799576001024
390799576001025
390799576001026
390799576001027
390799576001028
390799576001029
390799576001030
390799576001062
390799576001063
390799576001064
390799576001065
390799576002023
390799576002024
390799576002025
390799576002028
390799576002029
390799576003007
390799576003008
390799576003009

S. B. No. 259 Page 229
As Introduced
390799576003010
390799576003011
390799576003012
390799576003013
390799576003014
390799576003015
390799576003016
390799576003017
390799576003018
390799576003019
390799576003020
390799576003021
390799576003022
390799576003023
390799576003024
390799576003027
390799576003028
390799576003029
390799576003030
390799576003031
390799576003032
390799576003033

S. B. No. 259 Page 230
As Introduced
M Jackson PRECINCT JACKSON 3-A 390799575001000
390799575001001
390799575001005
390799575001006
390799575001012
390799575001013
390799575001014
390799575001015
390799575001016
390799575001017
390799575001018
390799575001019
390799575001020
390799575001021
390799575001022
390799575001023
390799575001024
390799575001025
390799575001026
390799575001027
390799575001028
390799575001029

S. B. No. 259 Page 231
As Introduced
390799575001030
390799575002001
390799575002002
390799575002004
390799575002007
390799575002008
390799575002009
390799575002010
390799575002011
390799575002013
390799575002019
390799575002020
390799575002021
390799575006033
390799575006034
390799576001013
390799576001014
390799576001015
390799576001017
390799576001031
390799576001033
390799576001036

S. B. No. 259 Page 232
As Introduced
390799576001039
390799576001040
390799576001041
390799576001045
390799576001047
390799576001048
390799576001049
390799576001050
390799576001051
390799576001052
390799576001053
390799576001054
390799576001055
390799576001056
390799576001057
390799576001058
390799576001059
390799576001060
390799576001061
390799576001066
390799577002026
390799577002033

S. B. No. 259 Page 233
As Introduced
390799577002043
390799577002050
390799577002051
390799577002052
390799577002053
390799577002054
390799577002055
390799577002058
390799577002059
390799577002060
390799577002061
390799577002062
390799577002063
390799577002064
390799577002068
390799577002071
390799578001001
390799578001002
N Jackson PRECINCT LICK I 390799573003040
390799573003042
390799573003043
390799573003044

S. B. No. 259 Page 234
As Introduced
390799573003045
390799574001080
390799574003016
390799575001031
390799575003012
390799575004016
390799575004017
390799575004018
390799575004037
390799575004038
390799575005020
390799575005023
390799575005024
390799575005035
390799575005036
390799575005037
390799575005040
390799575005042
390799575005043
390799575005045
390799575005046
390799575005047

S. B. No. 259 Page 235
As Introduced
390799575005048
390799575005049
390799575005050
390799575005051
390799575005054
390799575006015
390799575006016
390799575006017
390799575006018
390799575006021
390799575006023
390799575006024
390799575006025
390799575006027
390799575006030
390799575006031
390799575006032
390799575006035
390799575006036
390799575006037
390799576002001
390799576002002

S. B. No. 259 Page 236
As Introduced
390799576002003
390799576002004
390799576002005
390799576002006
390799576002007
390799576002008
390799576002009
390799576002010
390799576002011
390799576002012
390799576002013
390799576002014
390799576002015
390799576002016
390799576002017
390799576002018
390799576002019
390799576002020
390799576002021
390799576002022
390799576002026
390799576002027

S. B. No. 259 Page 237
As Introduced
390799576003000
390799577002056
390799577002057
O Jackson PRECINCT LICK II All
PRECINCT MILTON I
PRECINCT WASHINGTON
PRECINCT WELLSTON 1-A
PRECINCT WELLSTON 2-A
PRECINCT WELLSTON 2-B
PRECINCT WELLSTON 3-A
PRECINCT WELLSTON 4-A
P Lawrence All All
Q Licking All All
R Meigs All All
S Morgan All All
T Muskingum All All
U Noble All All
V Perry All All
W Vinton All All
X Washington Aurelius All

S. B. No. 259 Page 238
As Introduced
Barlow
Belpre 1A
Belpre 2A
Belpre 3A
Belpre 4A
Bev / Waterfor d
Decatur
Dunham East
Dunham West
Fairfield
Little Hocking
Lowell / Adam s
Y Washington Marietta 2A 391670205002001
391670205002002
391670205002004
391670205002007
391670205002009
391670205002010
391670205002011
391670205002012
391670205002013
391670205002014

S. B. No. 259 Page 239
As Introduced
391670205002015
391670205002016
391670205002017
391670205002018
391670205002019
391670205002020
391670205002021
391670205002022
391670205002023
391670205002025
391670205002026
391670205002027
391670205002030
391670205002031
391670205002032
391670205002033
391670205002034
391670205002035
391670205002036
391670208003005
391670208003006
391670208003007

S. B. No. 259 Page 240
As Introduced
391670208003008
391670208003009
391670208003010
391670208003014
391670208003015
391670208003016
391670208003017
391670208003018
391670208003019
391670208003020
391670208003021
391670208003022
391670210002037
391670210002038
391670210002039
391670210002040
Z Washington Marietta 4A All
Marietta 4B
MTTA West
MUSK East A
MUSK East B

S. B. No. 259 Page 241
As Introduced
AA Washington MUSK East C 391670209001000
391670209001001
391670209001002
391670209001005
391670209001006
391670209001007
391670209001008
391670209001012
391670209001013
391670210001011
391670213004070
391670213004071
391670213004072
391670214001000
391670214001001
391670214001002
391670214001003
391670214001004
391670214001005
391670214001024
391670214001025
391670214001026

S. B. No. 259 Page 242
As Introduced
391670214001027
391670214001028
391670214001029
391670214001031
391670214001032
391670214001033
391670214001037
391670214002054
391670214002055
391670214002056
391670214002057
391670214002058
391670214002059
391670214002060
391670214002061
391670214002062
391670214002063
391670214002065
391670214002066
391670214002067
391670214002068
391670214002069

S. B. No. 259 Page 243
As Introduced
391670214002070
391670214002073
391670214002074
391670214002075
391670214002076
391670214002077
391670214002085
391670214002086
391670214002087
391670214002088
391670214002089
391670214002105
391670214002106
391670214002108
AB Washington MUSK West All
Palmer
Rockland East
Rockland West
Salem
Vincent
Warren NE
Warren NW

S. B. No. 259 Page 244
As Introduced
Warren South
Waterford A
Watertown
Wesley
Sec. 3521.0113. The thirteenth congressional district 72
contains the following territory: 73
74
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Stark CANAL FULTON A All
CANAL FULTON B
CANAL FULTON C
CANAL FULTON D
CANTON CITY 1-A
CANTON CITY 1-B
CANTON CITY 1-C
CANTON CITY 1-D
CANTON CITY 2-A
CANTON CITY 2-B
CANTON CITY 2-C
CANTON CITY 2-D
CANTON CITY 2-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 245
As Introduced
CANTON CITY 3-A
CANTON CITY 3-B
CANTON CITY 3-C
CANTON CITY 3-D
CANTON CITY 3-E
CANTON CITY 4-A
CANTON CITY 4-B
CANTON CITY 4-C
CANTON CITY 4-D
CANTON CITY 4-E
CANTON CITY 4-F
CANTON CITY 5-A
CANTON CITY 5-B
CANTON CITY 5-C
CANTON CITY 5-D
CANTON CITY 6-A
CANTON CITY 6-B
CANTON CITY 6-C
CANTON CITY 6-D
CANTON CITY 7-A
CANTON CITY 7-B
CANTON CITY 7-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 246
As Introduced
CANTON CITY 7-D
CANTON CITY 7-E
CANTON CITY 7-F
CANTON CITY 7-G
CANTON CITY 8-A
CANTON CITY 8-B
CANTON CITY 8-C
CANTON CITY 8-D
CANTON CITY 8-E
CANTON CITY 8-F
CANTON CITY 8-G
CANTON CITY 9-A
CANTON CITY 9-B
CANTON CITY 9-C
CANTON CITY 9-D
CANTON CITY 9-E
CANTON CITY 9-F
CANTON CITY 9-G
C Stark CANTON TWP 1 391517012003021
391517012003029
391517023001135
391517025001063

S. B. No. 259 Page 247
As Introduced
391517025002008
391517025002009
391517025002024
391517025002025
391517025002038
391517025002039
391517132012028
391517132021001
391517132021002
391517132021003
391517132021004
391517132021005
391517132021012
391517132021013
391517132021014
391517132021015
391517132021016
391517132021018
391517132021019
391517132021020
391517132021027
391517132021028

S. B. No. 259 Page 248
As Introduced
391517132021029
391517132021057
391517133001000
391517133001003
391517133001004
391517133001005
391517133001007
391517133001009
391517133003000
391517133003016
391517133003017
391517133003021
391517134013000
391517134013001
391517134013029
D Stark CANTON TWP 3 All
E Stark CANTON TWP 6 391517018003001
391517018003002
391517018003005
391517018003009
391517018003024

S. B. No. 259 Page 249
As Introduced
391517018003025
391517018003053
391517018003058
391517021003110
391517124002068
391517124002069
391517124002076
391517124002077
391517124002078
391517124002079
391517124002080
391517124002081
391517124002082
391517124002088
391517124002089
391517124002090
391517124002091
391517124002092
391517124002093
391517124002094
391517124002095
391517124002096

S. B. No. 259 Page 250
As Introduced
391517124002097
391517124002098
391517124002099
391517131003000
391517131003001
391517131003002
391517131003003
391517131003004
391517131003005
391517131003006
391517131003007
391517131003008
391517131003011
391517131003012
391517131003013
391517131003014
391517131003015
391517131003016
391517131003017
391517131003018
391517131003019
391517131003020

S. B. No. 259 Page 251
As Introduced
391517131003021
391517131003022
391517131003023
391517131003024
391517131003051
391517131004000
391517131004001
391517131004003
391517131004004
391517131004006
391517131004007
391517131004009
391517131004011
391517131004012
391517131004019
391517131004020
391517131004023
391517131004024
391517131004025
391517131004026
391517131004027
391517131004028

S. B. No. 259 Page 252
As Introduced
391517131004029
391517131004030
391517131004031
391517131004033
391517131004034
391517131005008
391517131005009
391517131005010
391517131005011
391517131005012
391517131005014
391517131005015
391517131005016
391517131005017
F Stark JACKSON TWP 1 All
JACKSON TWP 10
JACKSON TWP 11
JACKSON TWP 12
JACKSON TWP 13
JACKSON TWP 14
JACKSON TWP 15
JACKSON TWP 16

S. B. No. 259 Page 253
As Introduced
JACKSON TWP 17
JACKSON TWP 18
JACKSON TWP 19
JACKSON TWP 2
JACKSON TWP 20
JACKSON TWP 21
JACKSON TWP 22
JACKSON TWP 23
JACKSON TWP 24
JACKSON TWP 25
JACKSON TWP 26
JACKSON TWP 27
JACKSON TWP 28
JACKSON TWP 29
JACKSON TWP 3
JACKSON TWP 30
JACKSON TWP 31
JACKSON TWP 32
JACKSON TWP 33
JACKSON TWP 4
JACKSON TWP 5
JACKSON TWP 6

S. B. No. 259 Page 254
As Introduced
JACKSON TWP 7
JACKSON TWP 8
JACKSON TWP 9
LAWRENCE TWP 1
LAWRENCE TWP 2
LAWRENCE TWP 3
LAWRENCE TWP 4
LAWRENCE TWP 5
LAWRENCE TWP 6
MASSILLON 1-A
MASSILLON 1-B
MASSILLON 1-C
MASSILLON 1-D
MASSILLON 1-E
MASSILLON 2-A
MASSILLON 2-B
MASSILLON 2-C
MASSILLON 2-D
MASSILLON 3-A
MASSILLON 3-B
MASSILLON 3-C
MASSILLON 3-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 255
As Introduced
MASSILLON 3-E
MASSILLON 4-A
MASSILLON 4-B
MASSILLON 4-C
MASSILLON 5-A
G Stark MASSILLON 5-B 391517141001021
391517141001023
391517141001024
391517141001025
391517141001026
391517141001027
391517141001028
391517141001029
391517141001030
391517141001031
391517141001032
391517141001033
391517141001034
391517141001035
391517141001036
391517141001038
391517141001039

S. B. No. 259 Page 256
As Introduced
391517141001040
391517141001041
391517141001042
391517141002000
391517141002001
391517141002004
391517141002005
391517141002006
391517141002007
391517141002008
391517141002009
391517141002011
391517141002012
391517141002013
391517141002014
391517141002015
391517141002016
391517141002017
391517141002019
391517141002022
391517141002023
391517141004000

S. B. No. 259 Page 257
As Introduced
391517141004001
391517141004002
391517141004003
391517141004004
391517141004008
391517141004009
391517141004010
391517141004011
391517141004012
391517141004013
391517142004016
391517142004017
391517144002033
H Stark MASSILLON 5-C All
MASSILLON 6-A
MASSILLON 6-B
MASSILLON 6-C
MASSILLON 6-D
MEYERS LAKE VILLAGE A
NORTH CANTON 1-A
NORTH CANTON 1-B
NORTH CANTON 1-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 258
As Introduced
NORTH CANTON 2-A
NORTH CANTON 2-B
NORTH CANTON 2-C
NORTH CANTON 2-D
NORTH CANTON 3-A
NORTH CANTON 3-B
NORTH CANTON 3-C
NORTH CANTON 4-A
NORTH CANTON 4-B
NORTH CANTON 4-C
I Stark OSNABURG TWP 3 391517131005043
391517131005044
J Stark PERRY TWP 1 All
PERRY TWP 10
PERRY TWP 11
PERRY TWP 12
PERRY TWP 13
PERRY TWP 14
PERRY TWP 15
PERRY TWP 16
PERRY TWP 17

S. B. No. 259 Page 259
As Introduced
PERRY TWP 18
PERRY TWP 19
PERRY TWP 2
PERRY TWP 3
K Stark PERRY TWP 4 391517144001016
391517144001020
391517144001021
391517144001022
391517144001024
391517144001025
391517144001026
391517144001027
391517144001028
391517144001029
391517144001030
391517144002005
391517144002008
391517144002020
391517144002024
391517144002046
391517144002049
391517144002050

S. B. No. 259 Page 260
As Introduced
391517146001012
391517146001013
391517146001014
391517146001015
391517146001016
391517146001017
391517146001018
391517146001019
391517146001020
391517146001021
391517146001022
391517146001023
391517146001024
391517146001025
391517146002003
391517146002006
391517146002007
391517146002008
391517146002038
391517146002039
391517146002040
391517146002041

S. B. No. 259 Page 261
As Introduced
391517146002053
391517146002054
391517146002055
391517146002056
391517146002057
391517146002058
391517146002059
391517146002064
391517146002065
391517146002066
391517146002068
391517146002070
391517146002090
391517146002091
L Stark PERRY TWP 5 All
PERRY TWP 6
PERRY TWP 7
PERRY TWP 8
PERRY TWP 9
PLAIN TWP 1
PLAIN TWP 10
PLAIN TWP 11

S. B. No. 259 Page 262
As Introduced
PLAIN TWP 12
PLAIN TWP 13
PLAIN TWP 14
PLAIN TWP 15
PLAIN TWP 16
PLAIN TWP 17
PLAIN TWP 18
PLAIN TWP 19
PLAIN TWP 2
PLAIN TWP 20
PLAIN TWP 21
PLAIN TWP 22
M Stark PLAIN TWP 23 391517002001012
391517002001013
391517002001014
391517002001017
391517002001018
391517002001019
391517002001020
391517002001021
391517002001022
391517002001023

S. B. No. 259 Page 263
As Introduced
391517002001029
391517002001032
391517002001034
391517002001036
391517002001048
391517002001051
391517002001052
391517002001053
391517002001054
391517002001055
391517002001056
391517002001062
391517002001064
391517002001065
391517002001071
391517002001072
391517002001073
391517002001074
391517002001077
391517002001078
391517002001079
391517002001080

S. B. No. 259 Page 264
As Introduced
391517002001081
391517002001082
391517002001083
391517002001084
391517004002000
391517004002032
391517124002004
N Stark PLAIN TWP 24 All
PLAIN TWP 25
PLAIN TWP 26
PLAIN TWP 27
PLAIN TWP 28
PLAIN TWP 3
PLAIN TWP 4
PLAIN TWP 5
PLAIN TWP 6
PLAIN TWP 7
PLAIN TWP 8
PLAIN TWP 9
TUSCARAWAS TWP 1
O Stark TUSCARAWAS TWP 2 391517140001000

S. B. No. 259 Page 265
As Introduced
391517140003003
391517140003004
391517140003009
391517140003012
391517147012017
391517147012018
391517147012020
391517147012030
391517147012031
391517147012032
391517147012037
391517147012039
391517147012060
391517147012061
391517147012062
P Summit All All
Sec. 3521.0114. The fourteenth congressional district 75
contains the following territory: 76
77
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Ashtabula All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 266
As Introduced
C Geauga All All
D Lake All All
E Mahoning AUSTINTOWN 1 All
AUSTINTOWN 10
AUSTINTOWN 11
AUSTINTOWN 12
AUSTINTOWN 13
AUSTINTOWN 14
AUSTINTOWN 15
AUSTINTOWN 16
AUSTINTOWN 17
AUSTINTOWN 18
AUSTINTOWN 19
AUSTINTOWN 2
AUSTINTOWN 20
AUSTINTOWN 21
AUSTINTOWN 22
AUSTINTOWN 23
AUSTINTOWN 24
AUSTINTOWN 25
AUSTINTOWN 26

S. B. No. 259 Page 267
As Introduced
AUSTINTOWN 27
AUSTINTOWN 28
AUSTINTOWN 29
AUSTINTOWN 3
AUSTINTOWN 30
AUSTINTOWN 31
AUSTINTOWN 32
AUSTINTOWN 33
AUSTINTOWN 4
AUSTINTOWN 5
AUSTINTOWN 6
AUSTINTOWN 7
AUSTINTOWN 8
AUSTINTOWN 9
BOARDMAN 1
BOARDMAN 10
BOARDMAN 11
BOARDMAN 12
BOARDMAN 13
BOARDMAN 14
BOARDMAN 15
BOARDMAN 16

S. B. No. 259 Page 268
As Introduced
BOARDMAN 17
BOARDMAN 18
BOARDMAN 19
BOARDMAN 2
BOARDMAN 20
BOARDMAN 21
BOARDMAN 22
BOARDMAN 23
BOARDMAN 24
BOARDMAN 25
BOARDMAN 26
BOARDMAN 27
BOARDMAN 28
BOARDMAN 29
BOARDMAN 3
BOARDMAN 30
BOARDMAN 31
BOARDMAN 32
BOARDMAN 33
BOARDMAN 34
BOARDMAN 35
BOARDMAN 36

S. B. No. 259 Page 269
As Introduced
BOARDMAN 37
BOARDMAN 4
BOARDMAN 5
BOARDMAN 6
BOARDMAN 7
BOARDMAN 8
BOARDMAN 9
CAMPBELL 1A
CAMPBELL 1B
CAMPBELL 2A
CAMPBELL 2B
CAMPBELL 2C
CAMPBELL 3A
CAMPBELL 3B
CAMPBELL 4A
CAMPBELL 4B
CANFIELD 1
CANFIELD 2
CANFIELD 3
CANFIELD 4
CANFIELD 5
CANFIELD 6

S. B. No. 259 Page 270
As Introduced
CANFIELD CITY 7
CANFIELD CITY 8
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 1
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 2
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 3
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 4
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 5
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 6
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 7
CANFIELD TOWNSHIP 8
F Mahoning COITSVILLE 02 390998137003003
G Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 1A All
YOUNGSTOWN 1B
YOUNGSTOWN 1C
YOUNGSTOWN 1D
YOUNGSTOWN 1E
YOUNGSTOWN 1F
YOUNGSTOWN 2A
YOUNGSTOWN 2B
YOUNGSTOWN 2C
YOUNGSTOWN 2D

S. B. No. 259 Page 271
As Introduced
YOUNGSTOWN 2E
YOUNGSTOWN 2F
YOUNGSTOWN 3A
YOUNGSTOWN 3B
YOUNGSTOWN 3C
YOUNGSTOWN 3D
YOUNGSTOWN 3E
YOUNGSTOWN 3F
YOUNGSTOWN 4A
YOUNGSTOWN 4B
YOUNGSTOWN 4C
YOUNGSTOWN 4D
YOUNGSTOWN 4E
YOUNGSTOWN 4F
YOUNGSTOWN 5A
YOUNGSTOWN 5B
YOUNGSTOWN 5C
YOUNGSTOWN 5D
YOUNGSTOWN 5E
YOUNGSTOWN 5F
YOUNGSTOWN 5G
YOUNGSTOWN 6A

S. B. No. 259 Page 272
As Introduced
YOUNGSTOWN 6B
YOUNGSTOWN 6C
YOUNGSTOWN 6D
YOUNGSTOWN 6E
YOUNGSTOWN 6F
YOUNGSTOWN 6G
YOUNGSTOWN 7A
YOUNGSTOWN 7B
YOUNGSTOWN 7C
YOUNGSTOWN 7E
YOUNGSTOWN 7F
H Mahoning YOUNGSTOWN 7G 390998013002013
390998013002014
390998013002016
390998013003009
390998014001000
390998014001001
390998014001005
390998014001006
390998014001012
I Trumbull All All

S. B. No. 259 Page 273
As Introduced
Sec. 3521.0115. The fifteenth congressional district 78
contains the following territory: 79
80
1 2 3
A County Voting districts Census blocks
B Delaware BERLIN A All
BERLIN B
BERLIN C
BERLIN D
BERLIN E
BERLIN F
COLUMBUS A
COLUMBUS B
COLUMBUS C
COLUMBUS D
COLUMBUS E
COLUMBUS F
COLUMBUS G
CONCORD A
CONCORD B
CONCORD C
CONCORD D
CONCORD E

S. B. No. 259 Page 274
As Introduced
CONCORD F
CONCORD G
CONCORD H
CONCORD I
CONCORD J
DELAWARE 1-A
DELAWARE 1-B
DELAWARE 1-C
DELAWARE 1-D
DELAWARE 1-E
DELAWARE 1-F
DELAWARE 1-G
DELAWARE 2-A
DELAWARE 2-B
DELAWARE 2-C
DELAWARE 2-D
DELAWARE 2-E
DELAWARE 2-F
DELAWARE 2-G
DELAWARE 3-A
DELAWARE 3-B
DELAWARE 3-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 275
As Introduced
DELAWARE 3-D
DELAWARE 3-E
DELAWARE 3-F
DELAWARE 3-G
DELAWARE 3-H
DELAWARE 4-A
DELAWARE 4-B
DELAWARE 4-C
DELAWARE 4-D
DELAWARE 4-E
C Delaware DELAWARE 4-F 390410102002001
390410102002002
390410102002003
390410102002004
390410102002005
390410102002006
390410102002010
390410102002011
390410102002016
390410102002017
390410102002018
390410102002019

S. B. No. 259 Page 276
As Introduced
390410102002020
390410102002021
390410102002025
390410102002026
390410102002027
390410102002028
390410102003044
390410102004022
390410102004023
390410102004024
390410102004025
390410102004026
390410102004027
390410102004029
390410102004031
390410102004032
390410102004033
390410102004036
390410102004037
390410111021089
390410115621005
390410115621006

S. B. No. 259 Page 277
As Introduced
390410122001003
390410122001013
390410122001063
390410122001064
D Delaware DELAWARE 4-G 390410102003024
390410102003025
390410102003026
390410102003027
390410102003028
390410102003029
390410102003030
390410102003031
390410102003032
390410102003033
390410102003034
390410102003035
390410102003039
390410102003040
390410102003041
390410102003042
390410102003043
390410102003051

S. B. No. 259 Page 278
As Introduced
E Delaware DELAWARE TWP A 390410102001000
390410102001001
390410102001002
390410102001003
390410102001004
390410102001005
390410102001009
390410102001010
390410102001011
390410102001012
390410102001015
390410102001017
390410102001018
390410102001025
390410102001026
390410102003000
390410102003002
390410102003011
390410102003015
390410104202010
390410104202017
390410104202021

S. B. No. 259 Page 279
As Introduced
390410104202023
390410104211000
390410104211001
390410104211009
390410104212008
390410104212014
390410104212015
390410104221000
390410104221014
390410104221030
390410104222013
390410104222014
390410104223002
390410105202006
390410105204006
390410105204011
390410105204012
390410105204014
390410105204016
390410105204017
390410105205003
390410122002004

S. B. No. 259 Page 280
As Introduced
390410122002007
390410122002016
390410122002017
390410122003002
390410122003004
390410122003005
390410122003011
390410122003012
390410122003021
390410122003022
390410122003030
390410122003031
390410122003033
390410122003034
390410122003035
390410122003036
390410122003037
390410122003038
390410122003042
390410122003043
390410122003044
F Delaware DELAWARE TWP B All

S. B. No. 259 Page 281
As Introduced
DUBLIN A
DUBLIN B
DUBLIN C
DUBLIN D
GENOA A
GENOA B
GENOA C
GENOA D
GENOA E
GENOA F
GENOA G
GENOA H
GENOA I
GENOA J
GENOA K
GENOA L
GENOA M
GENOA N
GENOA O
GENOA P
GENOA Q
GENOA R

S. B. No. 259 Page 282
As Introduced
GENOA S
GENOA T
LIBERTY A
LIBERTY B
LIBERTY C
LIBERTY D
LIBERTY E
LIBERTY F
LIBERTY G
LIBERTY H
LIBERTY I
LIBERTY J
LIBERTY K
LIBERTY L
LIBERTY M
LIBERTY N
MARLBORO
ORANGE A
ORANGE B
ORANGE C
ORANGE D
ORANGE E

S. B. No. 259 Page 283
As Introduced
ORANGE F
ORANGE G
ORANGE H
ORANGE I
ORANGE J
ORANGE K
ORANGE L
ORANGE M
ORANGE N
ORANGE O
ORANGE P
ORANGE Q
ORANGE R
ORANGE S
ORANGE T
ORANGE U
OSTRANDER
POWELL A
POWELL B
POWELL C
POWELL D
POWELL E

S. B. No. 259 Page 284
As Introduced
POWELL F
POWELL G
POWELL H
POWELL I
POWELL J
POWELL K
RADNOR
SCIOTO A
SCIOTO B
SHAWNEE HILLS
THOMPSON
TROY A
TROY B
WESTERVILLE A
WESTERVILLE B
WESTERVILLE C
WESTERVILLE D
WESTERVILLE E
WESTERVILLE F
WESTERVILLE G
WESTERVILLE H
WESTERVILLE I

S. B. No. 259 Page 285
As Introduced
G Franklin BLENDON-A All
BLENDON-B
H Franklin BLENDON-C 390490071141015
390490071141016
390490071141020
390490071141021
390490071141023
390490071143000
390490071143002
390490071143003
390490071143022
390490071144000
390490071144001
390490071144002
390490071144003
390490071144004
390490071144005
390490071144013
390490071144014
390490071144015
390490071202003
390490071202006

S. B. No. 259 Page 286
As Introduced
390490071202007
390490071202008
390490071202009
390490071203000
390490071203003
390490071203004
390490071203011
390490071203012
390490071203013
390490071203014
390490071203015
390490071203016
390490071203017
390490071203018
390490071203030
390490071203041
390490071203042
390490071203043
390490071991000
I Franklin BLENDON-D All
BLENDON-E
BLENDON-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 287
As Introduced
BROWN-A
BROWN-B
CLINTON-C
J Franklin COLS 02-A 390490056101012
390490056101013
390490056101014
390490056101015
390490056101021
390490056101023
390490056201006
390490056201007
390490056204001
390490056204005
390490056204006
K Franklin COLS 02-B 390490057004025
390490058101015
390490058101016
L Franklin COLS 02-C All
COLS 02-D
COLS 02-E
COLS 02-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 288
As Introduced
COLS 08-C
COLS 08-D
M Franklin COLS 08-E 390490052001000
390490052001001
390490052003000
390490052003001
N Franklin COLS 09-A 390490043021036
390490043021037
390490043021039
390490043021059
390490043021060
390490043021061
390490043021064
390490043023000
390490043023002
390490049001000
390490049005000
390490049005007
390490050021000
390490050021001
390490050021002

S. B. No. 259 Page 289
As Introduced
390490050021003
390490050021004
390490050021005
390490050021006
390490050021007
390490050021008
390490050021009
390490050021010
390490050021011
390490050021012
390490050021013
390490050021014
390490050021015
390490050021016
390490050022010
390490050022011
390490050022012
390490050023000
390490050023001
390490050023002
390490050023003
390490050023004

S. B. No. 259 Page 290
As Introduced
390490050023005
390490050023006
390490050023007
390490050023008
390490050023009
390490050023010
390490050023011
390490050023012
390490050023013
390490050023014
390490050023015
390490050023016
390490050024001
390490050024002
390490050024003
390490050024004
390490050024007
390490050024008
390490050024009
390490050024010
390490050024011
390490050024012

S. B. No. 259 Page 291
As Introduced
390490050024013
390490050024014
390490050024015
390490050024016
390490050024019
390490050024020
390490050024021
O Franklin COLS 09-B All
COLS 10-A
P Franklin COLS 10-B 390490043011009
390490043021015
390490043021016
390490043021017
390490043021025
390490043021026
390490043021027
390490043021028
390490043021029
390490043021030
390490043021031
390490043021032

S. B. No. 259 Page 292
As Introduced
390490043021033
390490043021063
Q Franklin COLS 10-C 390490043021038
390490043022000
390490043022001
390490043022002
390490043022003
390490043022004
390490043022005
390490043022006
390490043023001
390490043023003
390490043023004
390490043023005
390490043023006
R Franklin COLS 14-A All
COLS 14-B
COLS 14-C
COLS 14-D
COLS 14-E
COLS 14-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 293
As Introduced
COLS 14-G
COLS 15-A
COLS 15-B
COLS 16-A
COLS 16-B
S Franklin COLS 16-D 390490012001004
390490012002000
390490012002001
390490012002002
390490012002003
T Franklin COLS 16-E All
COLS 18-A
COLS 18-B
COLS 18-C
COLS 18-D
COLS 18-E
COLS 18-F
COLS 19-A
COLS 19-B
COLS 19-C
COLS 19-D

S. B. No. 259 Page 294
As Introduced
COLS 19-E
COLS 19-F
COLS 19-G
COLS 19-H
COLS 20-A
COLS 20-B
COLS 20-C
COLS 21-A
COLS 21-B
COLS 21-C
COLS 21-D
COLS 21-E
COLS 21-F
COLS 22-A
COLS 22-B
COLS 22-C
U Franklin COLS 22-D 390490077302006
390490077401011
V Franklin COLS 22-G All
W Franklin COLS 24-C 390490003102019
390490003102020

S. B. No. 259 Page 295
As Introduced
390490003102035
390490003102036
390490007104004
390490007104005
X Franklin COLS 30-C 390490069212000
390490069212001
390490069212002
390490069212004
390490069212005
Y Franklin COLS 33-A All
COLS 33-B
COLS 33-C
COLS 33-D
COLS 33-E
COLS 33-F
COLS 33-G
COLS 33-H
COLS 33-I
COLS 33-J
COLS 37-A
Z Franklin COLS 37-B 390490051002001

S. B. No. 259 Page 296
As Introduced
390490051002002
390490051002003
390490051002004
390490051002009
390490051002011
390490051002012
390490051002043
AA Franklin COLS 38-C 390490049001003
390490050022006
390490050022007
390490050022008
390490050022009
390490050022026
390490051002026
390490051002027
AB Franklin COLS 39-A All
COLS 39-B
COLS 39-C
COLS 39-D
COLS 40-A
COLS 40-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 297
As Introduced
COLS 40-C
COLS 41-A
COLS 41-B
COLS 41-C
COLS 41-D
COLS 41-F
COLS 41-G
COLS 41-H
COLS 41-I
AC Franklin COLS 43-A 390490002201000
390490003102016
390490003102018
390490003102021
AD Franklin COLS 59-A All
COLS 59-B
COLS 59-C
COLS 59-D
COLS 59-E
COLS 59-F
COLS 60-A
COLS 60-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 298
As Introduced
COLS 60-C
COLS 60-D
COLS 60-E
COLS 60-F
COLS 60-G
AE Franklin COLS 61-D 390490069444000
390490069444001
390490069911017
390490069911025
390490069911026
AF Franklin COLS 62-B 390490072022017
390490072022018
390490072022019
AG Franklin COLS 62-C All
COLS 63-A
COLS 63-B
COLS 63-C
COLS 63-D
COLS 63-E
COLS 63-F
COLS 63-G

S. B. No. 259 Page 299
As Introduced
COLS 63-H
COLS 64-A
COLS 64-B
COLS 64-C
COLS 64-D
COLS 64-E
COLS 64-F
COLS 64-G
COLS 64-H
COLS 65-A
COLS 65-B
COLS 65-C
COLS 65-D
COLS 65-E
COLS 65-F
COLS 65-G
AH Franklin COLS 66-F 390490069911024
390490071141007
390490071141012
390490071141013
390490071141014
390490071141017

S. B. No. 259 Page 300
As Introduced
390490071141018
AI Franklin COLS 69-A All
COLS 69-B
COLS 69-C
COLS 69-D
COLS 69-E
COLS 69-F
COLS 69-G
COLS 69-H
COLS 69-I
COLS 69-J
COLS 69-K
COLS 69-L
COLS 69-M
COLS 69-N
COLS 70-A
COLS 70-B
COLS 70-C
COLS 70-D
COLS 70-E
COLS 71-A
COLS 71-B

S. B. No. 259 Page 301
As Introduced
COLS 71-C
COLS 71-D
COLS 71-E
COLS 71-F
COLS 72-A
COLS 72-B
COLS 72-C
COLS 72-D
COLS 72-E
COLS 72-F
COLS 72-G
COLS 73-A
COLS 73-B
COLS 73-C
COLS 73-D
COLS 73-E
COLS 73-F
COLS 73-G
COLS 73-H
COLS 73-I
COLS 73-J
COLS 73-K

S. B. No. 259 Page 302
As Introduced
COLS 73-L
COLS 73-M
COLS 74-A
COLS 74-B
COLS 74-C
COLS 74-D
COLS 74-E
COLS 74-F
COLS 74-G
COLS 74-H
COLS 75-A
COLS 75-B
COLS 75-C
COLS 75-D
COLS 75-E
COLS 75-F
COLS 75-G
COLS 75-H
COLS 75-I
COLS 76-A
COLS 76-B
COLS 76-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 303
As Introduced
COLS 76-D
COLS 76-E
COLS 76-F
COLS 76-G
AJ Franklin COLS 77-A 390490079412005
390490079412019
390490079412020
390490079412022
390490079412023
390490079412024
390490079412025
390490079412027
390490079412028
390490079412029
390490079412038
AK Franklin COLS 77-B All
COLS 77-C
COLS 77-D
COLS 77-E
COLS 77-F
COLS 78-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 304
As Introduced
COLS 78-B
COLS 78-C
COLS 78-E
COLS 78-F
COLS 78-G
COLS 78-I
COLS 80-A
COLS 80-B
COLS 80-C
COLS 80-D
COLS 80-E
COLS 80-F
COLS 82-A
COLS 82-B
COLS 82-C
COLS 82-D
COLS 82-E
COLS 82-F
COLS 82-G
COLS 82-H
COLS 82-I
COLS 82-J

S. B. No. 259 Page 305
As Introduced
COLS 82-K
COLS 82-L
COLS 82-M
COLS 82-N
COLS 82-O
DUB 1-A
DUB 1-B
DUB 1-C
DUB 1-D
DUB 1-E
DUB 1-F
DUB 1-G
DUB 1-H
DUB 1-I
DUB 2-A
DUB 2-B
DUB 2-C
DUB 2-D
DUB 2-E
DUB 2-F
DUB 2-G
DUB 2-H

S. B. No. 259 Page 306
As Introduced
DUB 2-I
DUB 2-J
DUB 3-A
DUB 3-B
DUB 3-C
DUB 4-A
DUB 4-B
DUB 4-C
DUB 4-D
DUB 4-E
DUB 4-F
AL Franklin FRANKLIN-C 390490079412033
390490079412034
390490079652009
390490079652010
390490079652011
390490081721000
390490081721001
390490081721006
390490082421022
390490082421023
390490082421028

S. B. No. 259 Page 307
As Introduced
390490082421029
390490082421030
390490082421031
AM Franklin GRANDVIEW-A All
GRANDVIEW-B
GRANDVIEW-C
GRANDVIEW-D
GRANDVIEW-E
GRANDVIEW-F
HILL 1-A
HILL 1-B
HILL 1-C
HILL 1-D
HILL 1-E
HILL 1-F
HILL 1-G
HILL 2-A
HILL 2-B
HILL 2-C
HILL 2-D
HILL 2-E
HILL 2-F

S. B. No. 259 Page 308
As Introduced
HILL 3-A
HILL 3-B
HILL 3-C
HILL 3-D
HILL 3-E
HILL 4-A
HILL 4-B
HILL 4-C
HILL 4-D
HILL 4-E
MARBLE CLIFF-A
NEW ALBANY-A
NEW ALBANY-B
NEW ALBANY-C
NEW ALBANY-D
NEW ALBANY-E
NEW ALBANY-F
NEW ALBANY-G
AN Franklin NORWICH-A 390490079412017
390490079412018
390490079412031
390490079412039

S. B. No. 259 Page 309
As Introduced
390490079591003
390490079591010
390490079591011
390490079591015
390490079591017
390490079591018
390490079591019
390490079591020
390490079591021
390490079591022
390490079591023
390490079592000
390490079592002
390490079592003
390490079592004
390490079592005
390490079592006
390490079592007
390490079592010
390490079592011
390490079592012
390490079601012

S. B. No. 259 Page 310
As Introduced
390490079601016
390490079602004
390490079602005
390490079602008
390490079611008
390490079611009
390490079611011
390490079611012
390490079612011
390490079621003
390490079621006
390490079621008
390490079621009
390490079621026
390490079621029
390490079621038
390490080012026
390490080012027
390490080012029
390490080012030
390490080012031
390490106011012

S. B. No. 259 Page 311
As Introduced
390490106011017
390490106011026
390490106012001
390490106013017
AO Franklin NORWICH-B All
NORWICH-C
NORWICH-D
PERRY-A
PERRY-B
PERRY-C
PERRY-D
PLAIN-A
PLAIN-B
AP Franklin PRAIRIE-C 390490079592008
390490079592009
390490079652012
390490079652014
390490080012028
390490081652002
390490081662001
390490081662009

S. B. No. 259 Page 312
As Introduced
390490081662011
390490081662012
390490081662013
390490081662014
390490081662019
390490081662020
390490081662021
390490081662022
390490081662023
390490081662024
390490081662025
390490081662026
390490081662032
390490081662033
390490081662035
390490081662036
390490081711016
390490081712001
390490081712012
390490081712016
390490081712017
390490081712024

S. B. No. 259 Page 313
As Introduced
390490081712026
390490081721007
390490081721012
390490081721017
390490081721023
390490081721025
390490081721026
390490081721027
390490081721038
390490081721039
390490081721043
390490081722002
390490081722003
390490081722004
390490081722006
390490081722007
390490081722014
390490081722015
390490081722016
390490081722018
390490081722020
390490081722027

S. B. No. 259 Page 314
As Introduced
390490081722028
AQ Franklin RIVERLEA-A All
AR Franklin SHARON-A 390490063911000
390490063911002
390490063911009
390490063911021
390490063911022
390490063911023
390490063911024
390490063911025
390490063911026
390490063912011
390490063913002
390490063913003
390490063913004
390490063913005
390490063913006
390490063913007
390490063913010
390490063913011
390490063913012

S. B. No. 259 Page 315
As Introduced
390490069911015
390490069911018
390490069911019
390490069912000
390490069912001
390490069921001
390490069921002
390490069921008
390490070411013
390490070411014
390490070411021
390490070431003
390490070432000
390490070432004
390490070432005
390490070432006
390490070432007
390490070432008
390490070432015
390490070432034
390490070432037
390490070441007

S. B. No. 259 Page 316
As Introduced
390490070442001
390490070442008
390490070442009
390490070442012
390490070442013
390490070442016
390490070471012
390490070471013
390490070471014
390490070471015
AS Franklin SHARON-B All
UA 1-A
UA 1-B
UA 1-C
UA 1-D
UA 1-E
UA 1-F
UA 2-A
UA 2-B
UA 2-C
UA 2-D
UA 2-E

S. B. No. 259 Page 317
As Introduced
UA 2-F
UA 3-A
UA 3-B
UA 3-C
UA 3-D
UA 4-A
UA 4-B
UA 4-C
UA 4-D
UA 4-E
UA 5-A
UA 5-B
UA 5-C
UA 5-D
UA 5-E
UA 6-A
UA 6-B
UA 6-C
UA 6-D
UA 6-E
WASHINGTON-A
WESTERVILLE 1-A

S. B. No. 259 Page 318
As Introduced
WESTERVILLE 1-B
WESTERVILLE 1-C
WESTERVILLE 1-D
WESTERVILLE 1-E
WESTERVILLE 2-A
WESTERVILLE 2-B
WESTERVILLE 2-C
WESTERVILLE 2-D
WESTERVILLE 2-E
WESTERVILLE 2-F
WESTERVILLE 2-G
WESTERVILLE 3-A
WESTERVILLE 3-B
WESTERVILLE 3-C
WESTERVILLE 3-D
WESTERVILLE 3-E
WESTERVILLE 4-A
WESTERVILLE 4-B
WESTERVILLE 4-C
WESTERVILLE 5-A
WESTERVILLE 5-B
WESTERVILLE 5-C

S. B. No. 259 Page 319
As Introduced
WESTERVILLE 5-D
WESTERVILLE 5-E
WORTH 1-A
WORTH 1-B
WORTH 1-C
WORTH 1-D
WORTH 2-A
WORTH 2-B
WORTH 2-C
WORTH 3-A
WORTH 3-B
WORTH 3-C
WORTH 3-D
WORTH 4-A
WORTH 4-B
WORTH 4-C
WORTH 4-D
AT Union All All
Section 2. That existing section 3521.01 of the Revised 81
Code is hereby repealed. 82
Section 3. That sections 3521.011, 3521.012, 3521.013, 83
3521.014, 3521.015, 3521.016, 3521.017, 3521.018, 3521.019, 84
3521.0110, 3521.0111, 3521.0112, 3521.0113, 3521.0114, and 85

S. B. No. 259 Page 320
As Introduced
3521.0115 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 86